Skip to main content
Alarm.com - Smart Home & Business Security Systems
Get Started
Log In
Menu
For Home
Close
Total Protection
Security & Safety
Video Monitoring
Home Management
For Business
Close
Business Type
Small & Medium Business (SMB)
Commercial
Multi-location Management
Services
Intrusion Detection
Video Surveillance & Cameras
Access Control
Energy Management & Temperature Monitoring
Testimonials
Business Testimonials
Industry Solutions
Retail
Food and Beverage
K-12
Business Offices
Light Industrial
Testimonials
Business Testimonials
Specialized Solutions
Homebuilders
Senior Living & Care Providers
Resources
Close
Resources Hub
For Home
For Business
How To
FAQ
Compatible Hardware
Press Center
Contact Us
For Partners
Close
Partner Resources
Become a Partner
Login
AFRICA
Nigeria
South Africa
ASIA & PACIFIC
Australia
Japan
Malaysia
New Zealand
Singapore
Thailand
EUROPE
Belgium
Cyprus
Denmark
Finland
France
Iceland
Italy
Netherlands
Norway
Portugal
Spain
Sweden
Turkey
United Kingdom
NORTH & SOUTH AMERICA
Argentina
Bahamas
Barbados
Bermuda
Bolivia
Brazil
Canada
Cayman Islands
Chile
Columbia
Costa Rica
Dominican Republic
El Salvador
Guatemala
Jamaica
Mexico
Panama
Peru
Saint Kitts & Nevis
Trinidad & Tobago
Turks & Caicos
Uruguay
United States
US Virgin Islands
MIDDLE EAST
Israel
Log In
Search
Toggle
Alarm.com's Privacy Policy (United States)
Our Privacy Mission
Alarm.com Incorporated (
"Alarm.com," "we,"
or
"us"
) cares about the privacy of the information we collect about you.  This Privacy Policy explains how and when we collect, use, protect, and share your personal information and the rights and choices you can exercise in relation to your personal information.
1. Scope of this Privacy Policy
This Privacy Policy applies to information we collect about you if you reside in the United States or its territories. If you are a resident of a country other than the United States, you can
click here
to access the Alarm.com privacy policy specific to your country. Please note that your use of this Alarm.com website (
"Website"
), wherever you reside, is subject to our
Website Terms and Conditions.
Alarm.com collects and stores certain information from or about you that can be used to uniquely contact, identify, or locate you (
"Personal Information"
). We collect Personal Information through your use of (i) Alarm.com’s websites or mobile applications, including this Website and the Alarm.com mobile application (collectively, the
"User Interfaces"
), and (ii) any combination of products and services either provided to you or accessed via any User Interface (collectively, the
"Services"
).
End-Users of the Services
The Services are provided by licensed and authorized service providers (referred to as
"Authorized Service Providers"
) which independently sell and provide the Services to their customers (
"End-Users"
). If you are an End-User, then Alarm.com acts as a data processor and collects your Personal Information on behalf of your Authorized Service Provider when you use the Services, log into your account through the User Interfaces, or otherwise provide Personal Information to us regarding your account. You should also refer to your Authorized Service Provider’s privacy policy for information about their privacy practices.
Website Visitors and Other Individuals
If you are (i) not an existing End-User of the Services or are not logged into your account and use one of our User Interfaces (a
"Visitor"
) or (ii) providing Personal Information to us through the User Interfaces, email or phone, then Alarm.com processes your Personal Information while acting as a data controller.
2. When We Collect Personal Information
When You Provide Personal Information Directly to Us
When you (i) use the User Interfaces or the Services as a Visitor or End-User, (ii) participate in our marketing campaigns (including contests, promotions, or other activities), (iii) contact us for support, or (iv) otherwise communicate with us (including by phone, email, text, or online live chat), you may directly provide us with Personal Information.
When Your Authorized Service Provider Provides Personal Information Directly to Us
When you are an End-User of the Services, your Authorized Service Provider may directly provide us with Personal Information about your account, such as its features, settings and devices, in order to personalize and customize the Services for you.
When Personal Information is Collected Through Your Use of the User Interfaces or Services
When you use the User Interfaces or Services, Personal Information may be collected by automated means, such as through cookies and analytics on the User Interfaces. It may also be created and collected through your use of the Services, such as event history, device usage and saved video clips. We receive this Personal Information from the devices on your account, such as security sensors, thermostats and video cameras, and your computer, mobile phone or other electronic devices through which you may access, browse, download, receive, or otherwise use the Alarm.com User Interfaces or Services (each a
"Personal Device"
). We may also receive and process such Personal Information from third parties.
3. Types of Personal Information We Collect
Identifiers
When you use the User Interfaces or Services as a visitor or End-User, we may collect the following from you or other users on your account: name, home or business address, phone number, email address, home or business size, zip code, device names, and other identifying account or user information.
Account and Device Information
When you use the User Interfaces or Services as an End-User, we may collect the following from you or other users on your account:  account creation date, home or business system configuration, features enabled, service packages, IP addresses, device IDs, account and device settings, modes, automation settings, and device usage and performance (electrical usage or consumption, heating and cooling information, light or other fixture settings, and usage and alert logs).
Location-based Information
Some features of our Services, such as location-activated arming reminders, thermostat adjustments, and other location-based Services through your Personal Devices (collectively, "
GeoServices
"), use location information.  When you subscribe to the GeoServices and enable location-based features, we will automatically collect and store location information provided by your Personal Devices, such as mobile phones, GPS devices, or connected vehicle devices. This location information may include your current location or places you have recently visited.
Video and Audio
When you (i) subscribe to Alarm.com’s video Services, (ii) use a Personal Device that is capable of recording video and/or audio (such as a video doorbell or camera), or (iii) subscribe to emergency two-way voice services, you are enabling us, certain of our third-party service providers, our affiliates and subsidiaries, or your central station, to record, store, view and process video and/or audio live streams and saved recordings from your Personal Devices. This may include capturing and sending you portions of video or audio recordings as part of a notification or analyzing the video or audio live streams or recordings to identify motion, send you alerts, or trigger alarm or other events. In addition, if you have the recording features enabled, we will capture, process and store video and audio data recordings from your device and you may be able to access those recordings.
Data protection and privacy laws may impose certain responsibilities on you and your use of cameras and other devices with audio and video recording capabilities. You, not Alarm.com, are responsible for ensuring that you comply with any applicable laws. For example, you may need to display a notice that alerts visitors to your home or business that they may be recorded using cameras and other devices with audio and video recording capabilities. Alarm.com takes no responsibility for your compliance with these laws.
Biometric Information
In certain circumstances, our Services may include video cameras or other cameras capable of collecting  the facial geometry or measurements ("
Biometric Information
") of individuals captured in the camera’s field of view. We collect Biometric Information when an End-User (i) enables a feature that includes facial recognition or (ii) otherwise consents to the collection of biometric information. We may also collect Biometric Information from video cameras deployed in certain commercial business settings.  Any Biometric Information we collect is used solely to provide the Services for which such information was collected or to develop and improve our Services or the services of our affiliates and subsidiaries.  We do not sell Biometric Information to third parties.
Connected Vehicle Services Information
When you (i) subscribe to Alarm.com’s connected vehicle Services, such as Connected Car and Connected Fleet, and (ii) enable a Connected Car device by plugging the device into a vehicle, we may collect information about how a connected vehicle is performing, how it is driven, and where it is located.  This may include capturing the following categories of Personal Information from or about a connected vehicle:
Driver behavior information such as braking habits, seatbelt use and vehicle speed.
Vehicle information such as VIN, battery life, and whether your Connected Car device is plugged in.
Geolocation information (including the precise geolocation of the vehicle).
Any information you choose to provide such as driver’s license information or specific information about the vehicle.
Telephone Conversations and Calls
Calls to and from our customer service and support lines may be recorded and monitored, including by our employees, vendors, and artificial intelligence and similar technologies. In addition, we use a suite of technology solutions to assist with and to analyze telephone calls made to us and online chats.  These solutions may record callers’ voices and conversations, transcribe telephone conversations, use artificial intelligence to identify, authenticate and assist callers, and/or evaluate and make recommendations.  Many of these technology solutions and applications include software and related technology from vendors or other third parties, and we may share the data collected during calls and communications with these third-party entities.  By using our services, including telephone and website communications, you accept and consent to our collection of such data (including personal data) and to our sharing that data with others.
Other Information Collected via Chatbots
We use chatbots powered by third-party providers on our User Interfaces to provide you with information and support. When you interact with a chatbot on the User Interfaces, all the information you choose to provide to the chatbot may be collected and associated with your name or your IP address and a transcript of your interactions or communications with or through the chatbot may be created and stored.  You should not enter any information into the chatbot that you would not want saved, recorded, or monitored.  By using or interacting with a chatbot on our User Interfaces, you understand that you are communicating with automated self-service software provided by one of our third-party providers or communicating with our representative through one of our third-party providers; in either case, your communications may be saved, recorded, or monitored by us or our third-party provider.  You also consent to our and our third-party providers’ collecting, monitoring, recording, and managing any information (including Personal Information) that you enter into the chatbot or generate by using or interacting with the chatbot. We and our third-party providers may also collect, monitor, record and manage certain device and usage information automatically, including information collected in connection with the chatbot via cookies and other tracking technologies.  Our third-party chatbot providers include Salesforce (Privacy Statement:
https://www.salesforce.com/company/privacy/full_privacy/
) and ZoomInfo (Privacy Policy:
https://www.zoominfo.com/legal/privacy-policy
). For more information about how our third-party providers may collect, use, or disclose your information obtained by using or interacting with the chatbot, please read their privacy policies.
Cookies, Web Beacons and Website Analytics
When you use the User Interfaces or access Alarm.com Services using your Personal Device, certain information may be collected by automated means, such as cookies. For more Information about Alarm.com’s use of cookies, web beacons and website analytics, please visit our
Cookie Policy
.
4. How We Use the Information We Collect
We may use the Personal Information we collect to:
Provide the User Interfaces and Services to you;
Notify you about your account or changes to the User Interfaces or Services;
Provide you with customer support;
Personalize your experience with the Services and User Interfaces;
Provide notifications of, or evaluate your eligibility for, products or services offered by Alarm.com and our affiliates and subsidiaries;
Protect you, us, or others from security threats by enhancing the security of our network and information systems;
Identify and prevent fraud;
Enable or administer our business, such as for invoicing Authorized Service Providers;
Improve, evaluate, and develop new User Interfaces, Services and products and services of Alarm.com and our affiliates and subsidiaries, including by aggregating information to understand how our products and Services are being used; and
Comply with applicable laws and industry regulations.
5. Sharing of Personal Information
We will not share your Personal Information to any other entity except:
To your Authorized Service Provider, the company through which you subscribed to our Services;
To the central station selected by your Authorized Service Provider to receive alarm signals and coordinate emergency response;
When you have opted in to share the information, such as when you connect certain third party services or devices to your Alarm.com account;
When we need to share the information with a third-party who works on our behalf, such as a vendor or subcontractor, provided such entities are subject to confidentiality obligations;
To our affiliates and subsidiaries for the business purposes described in this Privacy Policy
To evaluate your eligibility for, or provide notifications of, products and services offered by us or our affiliates and subsidiaries;
When necessary in the case of a merger or combination with, or acquisition of a portion of our business by, another company or entity;
As necessary in connection with other lawful business purposes; and
As otherwise necessary when required or permitted by law.
6. How We Protect Your Information
We have implemented and maintain a comprehensive information security program consisting of policies, procedures, and technology designed to maintain the privacy, security and integrity of your Personal Information along with our data, intellectual property, confidential information, systems and networks. Our information security program is informed by externally established sets of standards, such as those of the National Institute of Standards and Technology and the Center for Internet Security. Among other things, the program includes controls designed to limit and monitor access to our systems, networks and data, prevent inappropriate or unauthorized access or modification, and monitor for threats or vulnerability. Please be aware, however, that no method of data transmission or storage is completely secure.  You are ultimately responsible for protecting your username and password for the User Interfaces and ensuring proper access to your Personal Devices.
You can find more information about our information security practices in Alarm.com’s annual filings with the U.S. Securities and Exchange Commission, which are available
here
.
7.  Your Privacy Rights and Choices
Depending on where you reside in the United States, certain state privacy laws may apply to the processing of your Personal Information.
7.1.  California Residents
If you are a California Resident, then please click on the "
California Residents Privacy Rights Notice
" for information about your rights and choices.
7.2 Residents in Other States with Privacy Laws
The following rights may apply to the processing of your Personal Information if you reside in a state with an applicable privacy law:
The right to confirm whether we are processing your Personal Information and to access such Personal Information.
The right to correct inaccuracies in your Personal Information, taking into account the nature of the Personal Information, and our purposes of the processing of such Personal Information.
The right to delete Personal Information provided by or obtained about you.
The right to obtain a copy of your Personal Information that you previously provided to us in a portable and if technically feasible, readily useable format that allows you to transmit the data to another controller without hindrance.
The right to opt out of the processing of your Personal Information for purposes of targeted advertising and the sale and sharing of Personal Information as described in the “Notice of Right to Opt-Out of Interest-Based Advertising” Section of this Privacy Policy.
The right to opt out of profiling in furtherance of decisions that produce legal or similarly significant effects concerning the consumer.
7.3 Notice of Right to Opt-Out of Interest-Based Advertising
We use cookies and similar tracking technologies on our User Interfaces (as described in our
Cookie Policy
) to deliver advertisements tailored to your interests.  Our use of such technologies to collect information for interest-based advertising may be deemed by applicable state laws as "targeted advertising," or a "sale" or "sharing" of Personal Information.
You may opt out of interest-based advertising by enabling the Global Privacy Control, a browser level tool that automatically communicates your opt-out preferences, or by going the Cookie Settings through the cookie banner or Cookie Policy on our Website. Through the Global Privacy Control, we can process your opt-out in a frictionless manner. You may also submit a request directly to us in accordance with the “Exercising Your Privacy Rights” Section of this Privacy Policy below.
To learn more about the Global Privacy Control, please visit:
https://globalprivacycontrol.org/#download
.
7.4 Exercising Your Privacy Rights
When Alarm.com acts as a data controller, for example when you submit information through our Website or we collect business contact information about you, you can exercise any of your rights described in this Policy by contacting us at
privacy@alarm.com
.  We may need to collect additional information about your previous interactions with Alarm.com to verify your identity. You may designate an authorized agent to submit requests on your behalf. To submit a request as an authorized agent on behalf of a consumer, please contact us at
privacy@alarm.com
. If we refuse to act upon your request, you may appeal such refusal by contacting us after your receipt of the refusal at
privacy@alarm.com
.
If you are an existing End-User of Services you may view, update, or delete certain Personal Information at any time by logging in and accessing your profile and address book pages. These changes will be immediately made to our records. If you wish to stop Services notifications, you may do so through the User Interfaces. For customers of Authorized Service Providers, you should refer to your Authorized Service Provider’s privacy notice for more information on your Authorized Service Provider’s privacy practices, the rights available to you, or to exercise a right under applicable privacy laws. Changes you make to your user profile on the Alarm.com User Interfaces to your user profile may not automatically change the records of your Authorized Service Provider. You should contact your Authorized Service Provider directly to make changes to its records. If you contact Alarm.com directly, we may forward your request to your Authorized Service Provider.
8. Third Party Websites
For your convenience, some hyperlinks may be posted on this Website that link to other websites not under Alarm.com's control. Alarm.com is not responsible for, and this Privacy Policy does not apply to, the privacy practices of those sites or of any companies that Alarm.com does not own or control. Alarm.com does not endorse any of these websites or pages, the services or products described or offered on such sites or pages, or any of the content contained on those sites or pages. Alarm.com encourages you to seek out and read the privacy policy of each website that you visit. In addition, should you happen to initiate a transaction on a website linked to this Website, even if you reached that site through the Alarm.com User Interfaces, the information that you submit to complete that transaction becomes subject to the privacy practices of the operator of that linked website. You should read that website's privacy policies to understand how Personal Information that is collected about you is used and protected.
9. Transfer of Personal Information from Outside of the United States
If you use our User Interfaces or Services from outside of the United States, please be aware that your information may be transferred to, stored or processed in the United States, where our servers are located and our central database is operated. The data protection and other laws of the United States and other countries might not be as comprehensive as those in your country. Our offices and data centers are located in the United States, so some of your Personal Information will be transferred to the United States in connection with your use of the Services. If you are located in the EEA, the UK or Switzerland, then the
"Privacy Notice to Data Subjects in the EEA, the UK and Switzerland"
applies to your use of the User Interfaces.
Alarm.com uses European Commission-approved "Standard Contractual Clauses" or "Model Clauses" and is also certified under the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework, the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework, and the Swiss-U.S. Data Privacy Framework (as described in our "
"Data Privacy Framework Notice"
") for the transfer of Personal Information from the EEA, the UK or Switzerland to the United States. To learn more about the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework, the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework, or the Swiss-U.S. Data Privacy Framework and to view our certification, please visit
https://www.dataprivacyframework.gov
10. Privacy Policy Changes
We may change this Privacy Policy at any time. Any changes to this Privacy Policy will be posted on our User Interfaces. The most recent version of this Privacy Policy is reflected by the version date located below. This Privacy Policy is not intended to and does not create any contractual or other legal right in or on behalf of any party.
11. California and Delaware Do Not Track Disclosures
Alarm.com responds to the Global Privacy Control, as described above. With respect to a different preference signal called Do Not Track browser requests, Alarm.com adheres to the standards set out in this Privacy Policy and does not monitor or follow any Do Not Track browser requests.
12. Contact Information
If you have any questions, concerns, or suggestions regarding this Privacy Policy, please contact us at:
privacy@alarm.com
or
Alarm.com Incorporated – Privacy
8281 Greensboro Drive, Suite 100
Tysons, VA 22102
USA
Last updated: July 9, 2024
Terms & Conditions
Terms & Conditions
Terms & Conditions (Canada)
Terms & Conditions (Canada - French)
Terms & Conditions (Brazil - Portuguese)
Terms & Conditions (Portugal - Portuguese)
Privacy Policy
Alarm.com's Privacy Policy (United States - English)
Alarm.com's California Residents Privacy Rights Notice
Privacy Notice to Data Subjects in the EEA and Switzerland
Alarm.com's Privacy Policy (Argentina - Spanish)
Alarm.com's Privacy Policy (Australia - English)
Alarm.com's Privacy Policy (Belgium - Dutch)
Alarm.com's Privacy Policy (Belgium - French)
Alarm.com's Privacy Policy (Brazil - Portuguese)
Alarm.com's Privacy Policy (Canada - English)
Alarm.com's Privacy Policy (Canada - French)
Alarm.com's Privacy Policy (Chile - Spanish)
Alarm.com's Privacy Policy (Colombia - Spanish)
Alarm.com's Privacy Policy (Costa Rica - Spanish)
Alarm.com's Privacy Policy (Denmark - Danish)
Alarm.com's Privacy Policy (Dominican Republic - Spanish)
Alarm.com's Privacy Policy (Ecuador - Spanish)
Alarm.com's Privacy Policy (El Salvador - Spanish)
Alarm.com's Privacy Policy (Finland - Finnish)
Alarm.com's Privacy Policy (France - French)
Alarm.com's Privacy Policy (Guatemala - Spanish)
Alarm.com's Privacy Policy (Iceland - Icelandic)
Alarm.com's Privacy Policy (Israel - Hebrew)
Alarm.com's Privacy Policy (Italy - Italian)
Alarm.com's Privacy Policy (Japan - Japanese)
Alarm.com's Privacy Policy (Malaysia - English)
Alarm.com's Privacy Policy (Malaysia - Malay)
Alarm.com's Privacy Policy (Mexico - Spanish)
Alarm.com's Privacy Policy (Netherlands - Dutch)
Alarm.com's Privacy Policy (New Zealand - English)
Alarm.com's Privacy Policy (Norway - Norwegian)
Alarm.com's Privacy Policy (Panama - Spanish)
Alarm.com's Privacy Policy (Paraguay - Spanish)
Alarm.com's Privacy Policy (Peru - Spanish)
Alarm.com's Privacy Policy (Poland - Polish)
Alarm.com's Privacy Policy (Portugal - Portuguese)
Alarm.com's Privacy Policy (Spain - Spanish)
Alarm.com's Privacy Policy (Sweden - Swedish)
Alarm.com's Privacy Policy (Thailand - Thai)
Alarm.com's Privacy Policy (Uruguay - Spanish)
Alarm.com Data Privacy Framework Notice
Cookie Policy
Alarm.com's Cookie Policy
Alarm.com's Cookie Policy (Canada - English)
Alarm.com's Cookie Policy (Canada - French)
Unsolicited Telemarketing Calls
NDAA
EU Radio Equipment Directive
ADC-AC-ET10, ADC-AC-ET20, ADC-AC-ET25 - Ethos Readers - CE DoC
ADC-AC-ET10, ADC-AC-ET20, ADC-AC-ET25 - Ethos Readers - UKCA DoC
ADC-AC-LP1501 - PoE Door Controller - CE DoC
ADC-AC-LP1501 - PoE Door Controller - UKCA DoC
ADC-AC-LP1502 - Door Controller - CE DoC
ADC-AC-LP1502 - Door Controller - UKCA DoC
ADC-AC-MR16IN - Input Monitor Expansion Module - CE DoC
ADC-AC-MR16IN - Input Monitor Expansion Module - UKCA DoC
ADC-AC-MR16OUT - Output Control Expansion Module - CE DoC
ADC-AC-MR16OUT - Output Control Expansion Module - UKCA DoC
ADC-AC-MR50 - Single Reader Expansion Module - CE DoC
ADC-AC-MR50 - Single Reader Expansion Module - UKCA DoC
ADC-AC-MR52 - Two Reader Expansion Module - CE DoC
ADC-AC-MR52 - Two Reader Expansion Module - UKCA DoC
ADC-AC-X100 - Two Reader Expansion Module - CE DoC
ADC-AC-X100 - Two Reader Expansion Module - UKCA DoC
ADC-AC-X200 - Input Monitor Expansion Module - CE DoC
ADC-AC-X200 - Input Monitor Expansion Module - UKCA DoC
ADC-AC-X300 - Output Control Expansion Module - CE DoC
ADC-AC-X300 - Output Control Expansion Module - UKCA DoC
ADC-AC-X1100 - Door Controller - CE DoC
ADC-AC-X1100 - Door Controller - UKCA DoC
ADC-BB-FLEX-A / ADC-FLEX-100 - FLEX IO - CE DoC
ADC-CSVR21XXP - Alarm.com Commercial Steam Video Recorder - CE DoC
ADC-R100 - Alarm.com System Enhancement Module - CE DoC
ADC-S2000 - Alarm.com Temperature Sensor with Probe - CE DoC
ADC-SVR210 - Alarm.com Stream Video Recorder - CE DoC
ADC-T2000 - Alarm.com Smart Thermostat - CE DoC
ADC-V515 - Alarm.com Indoor Wi-Fi Camera - CE DoC
ADC-V523 - Alarm.com 1080p Indoor Wi-Fi Video Camera - CE DoC
ADC-V523x - Alarm.com Wi-Fi Indoor Camera - CE DoC
ADC-V622 - Alarm.com 180⁰ HD Camera with Enhanced Zoom and Two-Way Audio - CE DoC
ADC-V723 - Alarm.com 1080p Outdoor Wi-Fi Video Camera with HDR - CE DoC
ADC-V723X - Alarm.com 1080p Outdoor Wi-Fi Video Camera with HDR - CE DoC
ADC-V724 - Alarm.com 1080p Outdoor Wi-Fi Video Camera with HDR and Two-Way Audio - CE DoC
ADC-V724x - Alarm.com 1080p Outdoor Wi-Fi Video Camera with HDR and Two-Way Audio - CE DoC
ADC-V729(DC) - 4MP Outdoor Camera Floodlight - CE DoC
ADC-VC827P - Alarm.com 1080p Indoor/Outdoor Dome Camera - CE DoC
ADC-VDB105X / ADC-VDB106X - Slim Line II Doorbell Camera - CE DoC
ADC-VDB750 - Alarm.com Video Doorbell - CE DoC
ADC-VDB755P - Alarm.com PoE Video Doorbell - CE DoC
ADC-VDB770 - Alarm.com Video Doorbell - CE DoC
ADC-VDB780B - Alarm.com Wireless Video Doorbell - CE DoC
ADC-W115C-INT - Alarm.com Smart Chime - CE DoC
UK PSTI Act 2022 - UK DoC
Security Feedback
Patents
X
Alarm.com uses cookies for security and to improve your experience on our site. Cookies enable you to enjoy a custom browsing experience and allows us to analyze our site traffic. Click 'Cookie Settings' to find out more about how cookies are used, change your preferences or to consent to the use of cookies by turning them ON.
Cookie settings
Cookie settings
This website uses essential cookies for the operation and security of the website and uses other cookies to improve functionality and the user experience.  You may select your choice of cookies to allow on our website below.
Disabled Toggle
Essential Cookies (required)
These cookies are strictly necessary to provide you with the services available through our website, including the use of certain features like secure access to password-protected accounts.  This category of cookies cannot be disabled.
Toggle
Non-Essential Cookies
Analytics Cookies
These cookies are used to enhance the performance and functionality of the website, but they are non-essential to your use of the website.  However, without these cookies certain functionality may be unavailable to you.  These cookies may collect information that help us understand usage of our website to measure and improve performance of our website.
Advertising/Tracking Cookies
These cookies are used to make advertising messages more relevant to you.  These cookies may also collect information about which pages you visit on our website and if you are accessing the website from clicking on advertising on another site or social network.  These cookies allow us to evaluate the effectiveness of our marketing campaigns and our website.
Sub-section Policy: 
Sub-policy 0
https://www.salesforce.com/company/privacy/full_privacy/:
Skip to content
See Privacy Statement
How we protect our Customer’s data as a Processor
Our cloud services are designed to help customers comply with privacy laws around the world. Discover more about our commitment to protecting customer data as a processor.
Global Privacy Resources for Salesforce Products
Data Processing Addendum
Data Processing Addendum FAQ
Data Transfer Mechanisms FAQ
Salesforce's Notice of Data Privacy Framework Certification
Trust and Compliance Documentation
Salesforce Audience Studio Privacy Policy
Salesforce's Notice of APEC CBPR and PRP Certifications
Salesforce's EU Processor Binding Corporate Rules
Salesforce's UK Processor Binding Corporate Rules
Salesforce Group Affiliates for UK Binding Corporate Rules for Processors
How we protect data as a Controller
We continuously monitor the global privacy landscape and adapt our privacy program accordingly. Discover more about our commitment to compliance with global privacy laws as a controller
Salesforce Candidate Privacy Statement
Salesforce Apps, Add-ins and Extensions Privacy Statement
Contact Information
To exercise your rights relating to your personal data, or if you have questions regarding our privacy practices, please fill out
this form
, or email us at
privacy@salesforce.com.
For more information about contacting us, see the “Contacting Us” section below.
Learn more
Important Information
Salesforce’s full Privacy Statement contains more information about Salesforce’s privacy practices.
Responsible Salesforce Entity
Salesforce, Inc. and/or its affiliated entities act as the controllers of your Personal Data and are responsible for its processing, unless expressly specified otherwise in our full Privacy Statement. For the avoidance of doubt, our Privacy Statement does not apply to the extent we process Personal Data in the role of a processor on behalf of our customers. A reference to “Salesforce,” “we,” “us” or the “Company” is a reference to Salesforce, Inc. and its affiliates involved in the processing activity. A list of Salesforce’s affiliates can be found in the List of Subsidiaries section of Salesforce’s most recent Form 10-K, available under the SEC Filings tab by selecting the “Annual Filings” filter on the page located here. Please see the "Contacting us" section, below, for our contact information and details of our Data Protection Officer (and in India, our Grievance Officer).
Purposes for which we process Personal Data
We collect and process Personal Data for a variety of purposes, including:
to provide our websites and social media branded pages;
to display personalized advertisements and content;
to manage event registrations and attendance (including ensuring the health and safety of our visitors and employees);
to send communications;
to handle contact and user support requests;
to provide and optimize the performance of our services;
to bill for our services and manage our accounts (including usage and licensing compliance);
to administer surveys and conduct research; and
to comply with our legal obligations.
For the list of purposes for which we Process your Personal Data, please see the full Privacy Statement.
We only collect and process your Personal Data to the extent it is necessary for fulfilling these purposes and where we can rely on a legal basis for such processing as set out in our full Privacy Statement. Where required, we will ask you for your prior consent to processing.
Please review the "What Personal Data do we collect?" and "Purposes for which we process Personal Data and the legal bases on which we rely" sections in our full Privacy Statement for further details. Also, please review the "How long do we keep your Personal Data?" section to learn how long we store your Personal Data.
Who do we share Personal Data with
We may share Personal Data with various parties, including:
Our contracted service providers that process Personal Data on our behalf for IT and system administration, credit card processing, research and analytics, marketing, customer support and data enrichment;
Affiliates within our current or future corporate group that process Personal Data for customer support, marketing, event management, technical operations and account management;
If you are using our services as an authorized user, with the Salesforce customer responsible for your access to the services for verifying your account, and reviewing compliance with our usage terms and policies;
Sponsors of events, webinar or contests for which you register;
Third-party networks and websites so that we can advertise on their platforms;
Specifically in relation to our AppExchange website, with our third-party partners who may contact you regarding their products or services; and
Professional advisers who provide consultancy, banking, legal, insurance and accounting services.
Please review the "Who do we share Personal Data with" section in our full Privacy Statement for the full list and more detailed information.
International transfer of Personal Data
Your Personal Data may be collected, transferred to and stored by us in the United States and by our affiliates and third parties (as disclosed in the full Privacy Statement) in other countries. Therefore, your Personal Data may be processed outside your  country or jurisdiction, including in places that may not provide the same level of protection. As described in the "International transfer of Personal Data" section of our full Privacy Statement, we have implemented safeguards to ensure an adequate level of protection where your Personal Data is transferred.
Data Transfer Mechanisms FAQ
Your rights relating to Personal Data
You have certain rights relating to your Personal Data, subject to local data protection laws. Depending on the applicable laws, these rights may include the right to:
Access your Personal Data held by us;
Know more about how we process your Personal Data;
Rectify inaccurate Personal Data and, taking into account the purpose of processing the Personal Data, ensure it is complete;
Erase or delete your Personal Data;
Restrict our processing of your Personal Data;
Transfer your Personal Data to another controller, to the extent possible;
Object to any processing of your Personal Data;
Opt out of certain disclosures of your Personal Data to third parties;
Know what categories of Personal Data are shared for delivering advertisements on non Salesforce websites, applications, and services and the categories of recipients of such Personal Data;
Opt out of the sharing of your Personal Data for delivering advertisements on non-Salesforce websites, applications, and services;
If you’re under the age of 16, or such other applicable age of consent for privacy purposes in relevant individual jurisdictions, opt in to certain disclosures of your Personal Data to third parties;
Not be subject to a decision based solely on automated processing, including profiling, which produces legal effects;
Withdraw your consent at any time (to the extent we base processing on consent); and
Not be discriminated against for exercising your rights as described above.
For more details on your rights and choices and how to exercise them, please review the "Your rights relating to your Personal Data" section in our full Privacy Statement.
Contacting us
To exercise your rights relating to your Personal Data, or if you have questions regarding our privacy practices, please fill out
this form
, email us at
privacy@salesforce.com
or
datasubjectrequest@salesforce.com
, call us at tel:1-855-938-3410 or write to us at:
Salesforce Data Protection Officer (Salesforce Privacy Team) (and in India, a Grievance Officer)
415 Mission St., 3rd Floor
San Francisco, CA 94105, USA
When you contact us, please indicate in which country and/or state you reside.
If you believe that we have not been able to assist with your complaint or concern, and you are located in the EEA or the UK, you have the right to lodge a complaint with the competent supervisory authority. If you work or reside in a country that is a member of the European Union or that is in the EEA, you may find the contact details for your appropriate data protection authority on the
following website
.
Situations
Categories of Personal Data
If you express an interest in obtaining additional information about our services; request customer support (including accessing the Help & Training Portal); use our “Contact Us” or similar features; register to use our websites or to receive communications; sign up for an event, webinar or contest; participate in a program, training, certification or survey; use our products and services; download certain content; or are employed by a customer of our products and services where your information has been shared with us
Contact information, such as your name, job title, company name, address, phone number, email address, username and password, other information you have voluntarily chosen to share
If you make purchases via our websites or register for an event or webinar
Contact information, financial and billing information, such as billing name and address, credit card number or bank account information
If you attend an event
Attendee badge information which may include name, title, company name, address, country, phone number and email address, image and video
If you give your explicit consent and only for specified events, your biometric information, such as an image of your facial features for identification purposes
During the Covid-19 pandemic, this may also include health status, including your temperature, COVID-19-related symptoms, exposure to COVID-19 positive individuals, vaccination status, testing results, and recent travel history
If you register with us for a variety of purposes, including joining a community that we host or participating in a program, training or certification
Username, photo, video or other biographical information, such as your occupation, location, social media profiles or usernames, company name, areas of expertise and interests
If you interact with our websites or emails
Information about your device and your usage of our websites or emails (such as Internet Protocol (IP) addresses or other identifiers), which may qualify as Personal Data (please see Section 4 below) using cookies, web beacons, or similar technologies
If you use and interact with our products and services
Information about your device and your usage of our services through log files and other technologies, some of which may qualify as Personal Data (including Usage Data) (please see Section 4 below)
If you communicate with us via a phone call
Information such as your name, voice and any other Personal Data voluntarily share
If you visit our offices
Name, email address, phone number, company name, time and date of arrival, image or video
During the Covid-19 pandemic, this may also include health status, including your temperature, COVID-19-related symptoms, exposure to COVID-19 positive individuals, vaccination status, testing results, and recent travel history
If you voluntarily submit certain information to us, such as filling out a survey, responding to a questionnaire or participating in other forms of research
Information you have provided as part of that request, which may include Personal Data and special categories of Personal Data, to the extent you voluntarily choose to provide it
If you are a supplier or service provider to Salesforce (or work for a supplier or service provider)
Contact information, payment and billing information
If you provide us, our service providers or our affiliates with any Personal Data relating to other individuals, you represent that you have the authority to do so, and where required, have obtained the necessary consent, and acknowledge that it may be used in accordance with this Privacy Statement. If you believe that your Personal Data has been provided to us improperly, or want to exercise your rights relating to your Personal Data, please contact us by using the information in Section 13 below.
3.2 Personal Data we collect from other sources
We also collect information about you from other sources including partners from whom we collect or purchase Personal Data or who provide us with publicly available information which may contain Personal Data. We may combine this information with Personal Data provided by you.
Provision of the services:
The Personal Data we collect to provide our products and services may include information you have made publicly available online (such as when using social media sites) or that is published by third parties and contains information about you (such as news articles). For a select number of services, we collect this Personal Data from partners who may receive this data when you visit or use their services or through the third parties they work with.
In addition, the Personal Data we collect to provide our products and services may include location information from third parties, which helps us offer features like identity management and multi-factor authentication.
Advertising: The Personal Data we collect from other sources for the purposes of tailored advertising includes identifiers, professional or employment-related information, education information, commercial information, visual information, internet activity information, and inferences about preferences and behaviors. We, collect this from third party providers of business contact information, including mailing addresses, job titles, email addresses, phone numbers, intent data (or user behavior data), IP addresses, social media profiles, LinkedIn URLs and custom profiles for purposes of targeted advertising, delivering relevant email content, event promotion and profiling, determining eligibility and verifying contact information. This helps us update, expand, and analyze our records, identify new customers, and create more tailored advertising to provide services that may be of interest to you.
Additional sources: In addition to the aforementioned, we collect Personal Data from the following sources:
Another individual at your organization who may provide us with your personal information, which may include Personal Data and special categories of Personal Data, to the extent you consent to providing it and sharing it, for the purposes of obtaining services and assessing our goals related to encouraging diversity within our vendors; and
Platforms such as GitHub to manage code check-ins and pull requests. If you participate in an open-source or community development project, we may associate your code repository username with your community account so we can inform you of program changes that are important to your participation or relate to additional security requirements.
Only where necessary for security purposes, we may collect information that is publicly available online (such as accessible through search engines or public social media sites), as well as images, physical descriptions and other pertinent information necessary to address a credible security threat to our employees, events or premises.
Type of Cookies
Description
Managing Settings
Required cookies
Required cookies are necessary for basic website functionality. Some examples include: session cookies needed to transmit the website, authentication cookies, and security cookies.
If you have chosen to identify yourself to us, we may place on your browser a cookie that allows us to uniquely identify you when you are logged into the websites and to process your online transactions and requests.
Because required cookies are essential to operate the websites, there is no option to opt out of these cookies.
Functional cookies
Functional cookies enhance functions, performance, and services on the website. Some examples include: cookies used to analyze site traffic, cookies used for market research, and cookies used to display advertising that is not directed to a particular individual.
Functional cookies may also be used to improve how our websites function and to help us provide you with more relevant communications, including marketing communications. These cookies collect information about how our websites are used, including which pages are viewed most often.
We may use our own technology or third-party technology to track and analyze usage information to provide enhanced interactions and more relevant communications, and to track the performance of our advertisements.
Salesforce may also use HTML5 local storage or Flash cookies for the above-mentioned purposes. These technologies differ from browser cookies in the amount and type of data they store, and how they store it.
We need your prior consent to use functional cookies. To change your cookie settings and preferences, including those for functional cookies, click the Cookie Preferences link in the footer of the page.
To learn how to control functional cookies via your individual browser settings, click
here
.
To learn how to manage privacy and storage settings for Flash cookies, click
here
.
Advertising cookies
Advertising cookies track activity across websites in order to understand a viewer’s interests and to direct marketing to them.
We sometimes use cookies delivered by us or by third parties to show you ads for our products that we think may interest you on devices you use and to track the performance of our advertisements. For example, these cookies collect information such as which browser you used when visiting our websites.
Salesforce also contracts with third-party advertising networks that collect IP addresses and other information from web beacons on our websites, from emails and on third-party websites. Advertising networks follow your online activities over time and across different websites or other online services by collecting certain data through automated means, including through the use of cookies. These technologies may recognize you across the different devices you use. When we work with third party advertising networks, we require them to restrict their data processing to only what is necessary to provide us with the advertising services we request.
We need your prior consent to use of targeting and advertising cookies. To change your cookie settings and preferences, including those for targeting and advertising cookies, click the Cookie Preferences link in the footer of the page.
See Section 4.3, below, to learn more about these and other advertising networks and your ability to opt out of collection by certain third parties.
For more information about Tableau and Slack’s use of cookies specifically, please see the
Tableau Cookie Policy
and the
Slack Cookie Policy
.
4.3 Notices on behavioral advertising and opt-out for website visitors
As described above, we or one of our authorized partners may place or read cookies on your device when you visit our websites for the purpose of serving you targeted advertising (also referred to as “online behavioral advertising” or “interest-based advertising”). To learn more about targeted advertising and advertising networks, please visit the opt-out pages of the Network Advertising Initiative,
here
, and the Digital Advertising Alliance,
here
. To opt-out of targeted advertising that is provided to us and to third parties by Salesforce Audience Studio, click
here
.
To manage the use of targeting and advertising cookies on this website, click the Cookie Preferences link in the footer of the page or consult your individual browser settings for cookies. To learn how to manage privacy and storage settings for Flash cookies, click
here
. Various browsers may also offer their own management tools for removing HTML5 local storage.
4.4 Opt-Out from the setting of cookies on your individual browser
In addition to using the user preference center, in many cases you may opt-out from the collection of non-essential device data on your web browser (see Section 4.1 above) by managing your cookies at the browser or device level. In addition, if you wish to opt-out of interest-based advertising, click
here
(or, if located in the European Union or United Kingdom, click
here
). To opt-out of targeted advertising that is provided to us and to third parties by Salesforce Audience Studio, click
here
. Please note, however, that by blocking or deleting cookies and similar technologies used on our websites, you may not be able to take full advantage of the websites.
While some internet browsers offer a “do not track” or “DNT” option that lets you tell websites that you do not want to have your online activities tracked, these features are not yet uniform and there is no common standard adopted by industry groups, technology companies, or regulators. Therefore, we do not currently commit to responding to browsers’ DNT signals with respect to our websites. Salesforce takes privacy and meaningful choice seriously and will make efforts to continue to monitor developments around DNT browser technology and the implementation of a standard.
4.5 Social Media Features
Our websites may use social media features, such as the “Tweet” button and other sharing widgets (“Social Media Features”). Social Media Features may allow you to post information about your activities on our website to outside platforms and social networks. Social Media Features may also allow you to like or highlight information we have posted on our website or our branded social media pages. Social Media Features are either hosted by each respective platform or hosted directly on our website. To the extent the Social Media Features are hosted by the platforms themselves, and you click through to these from our websites, the platform may receive information showing that you have visited our websites. If you are logged in to your social media account, it is possible that the respective social media network can link your visit to our websites with your social media profile.
Salesforce also allows you to log in to certain of our websites using sign-in services. These services authenticate your identity and provide you the option to share certain Personal Data from these services with us such as your name and email address to pre-populate our sign-up form.
Your interactions with Social Media Features are governed by the privacy policies of the companies providing them.
4.6 Telephony log information
If you use certain features of our services on a mobile device, we may also collect telephony log information (like phone numbers, time and date of calls, duration of calls, SMS routing information and types of calls), device event information (such as crashes, system activity, hardware settings, browser language), and location information (through IP address, GPS, and other sensors that may, for example, provide us with information on nearby devices, Wi-Fi access points and cell towers).
Purpose
Description
Legal basis
Providing our websites (including our social media pages)
We process your Personal Data to operate and administer our websites and to provide you with the content you access and request
Our legitimate interest in providing online content to our customers and prospective customers regarding our service offering and related information
Improving our websites
We process your Personal Data to analyze overall trends and help us improve the user experience on our websites
Our legitimate interest in providing a relevant and well-functioning website for the benefit of our website visitors
Promoting the security of our websites
We process your Personal Data by tracking use of our websites and verifying and investigating activity
Our legitimate interest in promoting the safety and security of our websites and in protecting our rights and the rights of others
Displaying personalized advertisements and content
We process your Personal Data to conduct market research, advertise to you, provide personalized information about us on and off our websites and to provide other personalized content based upon your activities and interests
Our legitimate interest in advertising our products and services or, where necessary, to the extent you have provided your prior consent
Please see Section 10 below, to learn how you can control the processing of your Personal Data by Salesforce for personalized advertising purposes
Registering visitors
We process your Personal Data, including registration information and associated non-disclosure information, for security reasons
Our legitimate interest in protecting our offices, staff, visitors and our confidential information against unauthorized access
Managing event registrations and attendance
Managing event registrations and attendance
We process your Personal Data to plan and host events or webinars for which you have registered or that you attend, including sending related communications to you
Where you explicitly consent, we also may process your biometric Personal Data to facilitate event registration and for security reasons
Performance of a contract or where we receive your explicit consent
Ensuring the health of our visitors and employees
We process your Personal Data (which may include special categories of Personal Data) (where legally permitted) during office visits and at events during the COVID-19 pandemic to ensure the health and safety of our visitors and employees
Consent and explicit consent or in our legitimate interest to ensure the health of our employees and visitors where necessary for reasons of public interest in the area of public health
Ensuring the safety and security of our employees, events and premises
We process your Personal Data where necessary based on a credible threat to our employees, events or premises
Our legitimate interest in protecting our employees, events and premises
Sending communications
We process your Personal Data to send you marketing information, product recommendations and other non-transactional communications (e.g., marketing newsletters, telemarketing calls, SMS or push notifications, information about our products, news or events) about us, our affiliates and partners
Our legitimate interest in conducting direct marketing or where you have provided your prior consent (please see Section 10 below to learn how you can control the processing of your Personal Data by Salesforce for marketing purposes)
Recording phone calls
We process your Personal Data, including recording phone calls (in accordance with applicable laws) for training, quality assurance, and administration purposes
If required under applicable law, we will give you the option to object to a call being recorded
Consent or our legitimate interest in maintaining the high quality of our phone calls with users
Handling contact and user support requests
We process your Personal Data, if you fill out a “Contact Me” web form or request user support, or if you contact us by other means including but not limited to via phone
Necessary for the performance of a contract or our legitimate interest in fulfilling your requests and communicating with you
Providing our services
We process your Personal Data to perform our contract with you for the provision of our services and to satisfy our obligations under the applicable terms of use
Necessary for the performance of a contract or our legitimate interest to provide and administer our services
Developing and optimizing the performance of the services
We process your Personal Data to
develop, optimize, and improve
the performance of the services
Legitimate interest to develop services and ensure that the services are performing in line with customer expectations; if special categories of Personal Data are processed, where the Personal Data is manifestly made public by the data subject
Providing personalized interactions
We process your Personal Data to customize our interactions with you
Legitimate interest to offer the best-in class services to our customers
Managing our customer and user accounts
We process your Personal Data (including Usage Data) to manage customer and user accounts generally, such as billing, customer correspondence and customer relationship management
Necessary for the performance of a contract or our legitimate interest in the management of customer and user accounts
Managing usage and licensing compliance
We process your Personal Data (including Usage Data) to assess and manage usage and licensing compliance with the applicable terms of use of our services
Necessary for the performance of a contract or our legitimate interest in managing the provision of our services to customers
Preparing internal reports and business modeling
We process your Personal Data (including Usage Data) for internal reporting and business modeling purposes (e.g., forecasting, revenue, capacity planning, product strategy)
Our legitimate interest in the management of our business operations
Maintaining our security
We process your Personal Data (including your Usage Data) for the purposes of maintaining Salesforce’s own security, including investigating, detecting and preventing suspicious activity, fraud and cybercrime that may affect Salesforce or its services
Our legitimate interest in promoting the safety and security of Salesforce generally and to protect our rights and the rights of others
Managing compensation for employees
We process your Personal Data (including your Usage Data) for the purposes of determining compensation for Salesforce employees, such as commission
Necessary for the performance of a contract with an employee or our legitimate interest in fairly compensating our employees
Undertaking financial reporting
We process your Personal Data (including your Usage Data) for the purposes of financial reporting
Our legitimate interest in meeting our obligations associated with the reporting of our finances
Aggregating data
We process your Personal Data (including your Usage Data) for the purposes of aggregating this information to ensure that it is no longer identifying
Our legitimate interest in minimizing the amount of Personal Data processed as part of the noted processing activity
Managing, and participating in, webinars, contests, programs, training, certifications or promotions
We process your Personal Data if you register for a webinar, contest, promotion, training, certification or a program.
In some cases where the training or certification is through your employer, we will share your we will share your Personal Data with your employer
Some webinars, contests, programs, trainings, certifications and promotions have additional rules containing information about how we will process your Personal Data
Consent, necessary for the performance of a contract or our legitimate interest in providing the webinar, contest, promotion, training, certification or promotion
Managing payments
If you have provided financial information to us, we process your Personal Data to verify that information and to collect payments to the extent that doing so is necessary to complete a transaction and perform our contract with you
Necessary for the performance of a contract
Administering surveys and conducting research
We process your Personal Data (including, where legally permitted, special categories of Personal Data) in order to meet the goals set out in surveys or research as well as to analyze our compliance with internal policies
Consent or explicit consent (if required under applicable law) or our legitimate interest in conducting the survey or research based on its stated goals (where no special categories of Personal Data are in scope)
Participating in a Salesforce community, such as that focused on open-source development
We process your Personal Data, such as your username associated with your community account, in order to host and maintain the community for the benefit of its members
Our legitimate interest in hosting and maintaining such a community for the benefits of its members, as well as in order to inform you of program changes that are important to your participation or relate to additional security measures
Collecting diversity information
We process your Personal Data (including special categories of Personal Data) to the extent you voluntarily consent to provide it to meet our broader community goals related to diversity and equality of opportunity
Consent or explicit consent (if required under applicable law)
Complying with legal obligations
We process your Personal Data (including Usage Data) when cooperating with public and government authorities, courts or regulators in accordance with our legal obligations under applicable laws to the extent this requires the processing or disclosure of Personal Data to protect our rights
Legal obligation or our legitimate interest in protecting against misuse or abuse of our websites or services, protecting personal property or safety, pursuing remedies available to us and limiting our damages, complying with judicial proceedings, court orders or legal processes, responding to lawful requests, or for auditing purposes
If we need to collect and process Personal Data by law, or under a contract we have entered into with you, and you fail to provide the required Personal Data when requested, we may not be able to perform our contract with you.
Requests Submitted
Requests Fulfilled in Whole Or In Part*
Average Days to Respond
Average Days to Complete a Request**
Requests for access to Personal Data
44
32
1
49
Requests to delete Personal Data
210
143
1
29
Requests to correct Personal Data
4
0
1
3
Objections to processing Personal Data
7
4
1
15
Requests to opt-out of Sharing
2,064
2,064
n/A
5
*Requests may be unable to be completed due to factors like duplicate requests, the inability to verify the resident’s identity or lack of response.
**Time to complete a request may depend in part on receipt of information from the person making the request, such as information to verify the person’s identity or information about the action requested.  Data is for all requests received by the Salesforce Family Affiliates from California residents between January 1 and December 31, 2023.
Contact us
Sub-policy 1
https://www.zoominfo.com/legal/privacy-policy:
Press & Hold to confirm you are
a human (and not a bot).
Having a problem?
Reference ID 30b87e41-ffc2-11ef-ae14-9da3b6ebb7d2
Report a problem
Experiencing issues with this page? please let us know:
You can contact us for assistance. You should use Ref ID
:
30b87e41-ffc2-11ef-ae14-9da3b6ebb7d2
You can also send us your feedback:
I’m a bot
I do not see where to confirm
I keep getting the "Please try again" message
Other (please elaborate below)
Experiencing other issues?
Cancel
Send
✓
Thank you for the feedback
Sub-policy 2
https://www.alarm.com/legal/california-privacy-policy:
Skip to main content
Alarm.com - Smart Home & Business Security Systems
Get Started
Log In
Menu
For Home
Close
Total Protection
Security & Safety
Video Monitoring
Home Management
For Business
Close
Business Type
Small & Medium Business (SMB)
Commercial
Multi-location Management
Services
Intrusion Detection
Video Surveillance & Cameras
Access Control
Energy Management & Temperature Monitoring
Testimonials
Business Testimonials
Industry Solutions
Retail
Food and Beverage
K-12
Business Offices
Light Industrial
Testimonials
Business Testimonials
Specialized Solutions
Homebuilders
Senior Living & Care Providers
Resources
Close
Resources Hub
For Home
For Business
How To
FAQ
Compatible Hardware
Press Center
Contact Us
For Partners
Close
Partner Resources
Become a Partner
Login
AFRICA
Nigeria
South Africa
ASIA & PACIFIC
Australia
Japan
Malaysia
New Zealand
Singapore
Thailand
EUROPE
Belgium
Cyprus
Denmark
Finland
France
Iceland
Italy
Netherlands
Norway
Portugal
Spain
Sweden
Turkey
United Kingdom
NORTH & SOUTH AMERICA
Argentina
Bahamas
Barbados
Bermuda
Bolivia
Brazil
Canada
Cayman Islands
Chile
Columbia
Costa Rica
Dominican Republic
El Salvador
Guatemala
Jamaica
Mexico
Panama
Peru
Saint Kitts & Nevis
Trinidad & Tobago
Turks & Caicos
Uruguay
United States
US Virgin Islands
MIDDLE EAST
Israel
Log In
Search
Toggle
Alarm.com's California Residents Privacy Rights Notice
If you are a California resident, the California Consumer Privacy Act, as amended by the California Privacy Rights Act (“CCPA”) may provide you with specific rights regarding your Personal Information. This section of our Privacy Policy contains certain required information and informs California residents of certain rights arising under the CCPA.
We may have collected the following categories of Personal Information from you within the last twelve (12) months:
Identifiers — such as name, postal address, email address, or account name.
Unique and online identifiers – such as internet protocol address or device IDs.
Commercial information — such as records of products or services purchased.
Demographic information — such as gender, age, income levels, and language preferences.
Internet or other electronic network activity information — such as browsing history, search history and information regarding an individual’s interaction with an internet website, application, or advertisement.
Geolocation information.
Online viewing activities (e.g., videos viewed, pages viewed).
Inferences, such as preferences and behaviors.
Sensitive Personal Information — such as precise geolocation information.
We collect the above categories of Personal Information from the following sources:
Directly from you.
Automatically generated information — such as technical, equipment and usage information from your interactions with User Interfaces.
Your employer (if you are an employee of an Authorized Service Provider).
From other companies, such as marketing services.
From our affiliates and subsidiaries.
We collect the above categories of Personal Information for the following business and commercial purposes:
Performing our Services.
Auditing customer transactions.
Fraud prevention and authentication or identification verification.
Debugging errors in systems.
Marketing and advertising.
Internal research, analytics and development — such as user-preference analytics.
Developing, maintaining, provisioning or upgrading networks, services or devices.
Categories of Personal Information “Sold” or “Shared” to Third Parties and the Business and Commercial Purpose
The categories of Personal Information that we have “sold” or “shared” to third parties in the last twelve (12) months and the business and commercial purposes for “selling” or “sharing” such Personal Information are set forth below in the “Notice of Right to Opt-out of Sale and Sharing Personal Information and Targeted Advertising” Section of the Alarm.com Privacy Policy. We do not knowingly “sell” or “share” the Personal Information of individuals under sixteen (16) years of age.
Disclosures of Personal Information
We may have disclosed each of the above categories of Personal Information with the following categories of third parties who perform services on our behalf:
Product and services delivery companies.
Marketing services companies.
Cloud storage companies.
Credit reporting agencies.
Billing and payment processing companies.
Fraud prevention and authentication/identity verification entities.
Analytics companies.
Our affiliates and subsidiaries
Retention of Personal Information
We retain the Personal Information that we collect to achieve the purposes for which the Personal Information was collected. In certain cases, we may need to retain Personal Information for purposes required under applicable law, for tax, accounting, or audit purposes, or for other purposes permitted or required under law.
Use and Disclosure of Sensitive Personal Information
We may collect “sensitive” Personal Information for limited purposes, including for purposes that an average consumer would reasonably expect. We do not use or disclose your sensitive Personal Information outside of the following purposes:
Performing our Services or providing goods.
Detecting security incidents.
Resisting malicious, deceptive, fraudulent, or illegal actions.
Ensuring physical safety.
For short-term transient use, including certain non-personalized advertising.
Maintaining or servicing accounts, providing customer service, verifying customer information, or providing similar services.
Verifying and maintaining the quality or safety of a service or product or improving, upgrading, or enhancing a service or product.
As such, the right to limit our use and disclosure of such sensitive information does not apply.
Your California Privacy Rights
The following rights apply to California residents:
The right to request that businesses subject to the CCPA (which may include your Authorized Service Provider) disclose certain information to you about their collection and use of your Personal Information over the past 12 months including the categories of information, the categories of sources from which the Personal Information is collected, the business or commercial purpose for collecting, selling, or sharing Personal Information, the categories of third parties to whom the business disclosed Personal Information, and the specific pieces of Personal Information collected about you.
The right to ask such businesses to delete or correct Personal Information collected for you, subject to certain exceptions.
The right to opt out of a business selling or sharing your Personal Information.
You may ask a business to limit its use of your sensitive Personal Information (e.g., biometric information or ethnicity), but know that Alarm.com doesn’t use your sensitive Personal Information in a manner subject to that right.
If you choose to exercise your rights, you also have the right not to be discriminated against and will not be charged different prices or provided different quality of services.
Terms & Conditions
Terms & Conditions
Terms & Conditions (Canada)
Terms & Conditions (Canada - French)
Terms & Conditions (Brazil - Portuguese)
Terms & Conditions (Portugal - Portuguese)
Privacy Policy
Alarm.com's Privacy Policy (United States - English)
Alarm.com's California Residents Privacy Rights Notice
Privacy Notice to Data Subjects in the EEA and Switzerland
Alarm.com's Privacy Policy (Argentina - Spanish)
Alarm.com's Privacy Policy (Australia - English)
Alarm.com's Privacy Policy (Belgium - Dutch)
Alarm.com's Privacy Policy (Belgium - French)
Alarm.com's Privacy Policy (Brazil - Portuguese)
Alarm.com's Privacy Policy (Canada - English)
Alarm.com's Privacy Policy (Canada - French)
Alarm.com's Privacy Policy (Chile - Spanish)
Alarm.com's Privacy Policy (Colombia - Spanish)
Alarm.com's Privacy Policy (Costa Rica - Spanish)
Alarm.com's Privacy Policy (Denmark - Danish)
Alarm.com's Privacy Policy (Dominican Republic - Spanish)
Alarm.com's Privacy Policy (Ecuador - Spanish)
Alarm.com's Privacy Policy (El Salvador - Spanish)
Alarm.com's Privacy Policy (Finland - Finnish)
Alarm.com's Privacy Policy (France - French)
Alarm.com's Privacy Policy (Guatemala - Spanish)
Alarm.com's Privacy Policy (Iceland - Icelandic)
Alarm.com's Privacy Policy (Israel - Hebrew)
Alarm.com's Privacy Policy (Italy - Italian)
Alarm.com's Privacy Policy (Japan - Japanese)
Alarm.com's Privacy Policy (Malaysia - English)
Alarm.com's Privacy Policy (Malaysia - Malay)
Alarm.com's Privacy Policy (Mexico - Spanish)
Alarm.com's Privacy Policy (Netherlands - Dutch)
Alarm.com's Privacy Policy (New Zealand - English)
Alarm.com's Privacy Policy (Norway - Norwegian)
Alarm.com's Privacy Policy (Panama - Spanish)
Alarm.com's Privacy Policy (Paraguay - Spanish)
Alarm.com's Privacy Policy (Peru - Spanish)
Alarm.com's Privacy Policy (Poland - Polish)
Alarm.com's Privacy Policy (Portugal - Portuguese)
Alarm.com's Privacy Policy (Spain - Spanish)
Alarm.com's Privacy Policy (Sweden - Swedish)
Alarm.com's Privacy Policy (Thailand - Thai)
Alarm.com's Privacy Policy (Uruguay - Spanish)
Alarm.com Data Privacy Framework Notice
Cookie Policy
Alarm.com's Cookie Policy
Alarm.com's Cookie Policy (Canada - English)
Alarm.com's Cookie Policy (Canada - French)
Unsolicited Telemarketing Calls
NDAA
EU Radio Equipment Directive
ADC-AC-ET10, ADC-AC-ET20, ADC-AC-ET25 - Ethos Readers - CE DoC
ADC-AC-ET10, ADC-AC-ET20, ADC-AC-ET25 - Ethos Readers - UKCA DoC
ADC-AC-LP1501 - PoE Door Controller - CE DoC
ADC-AC-LP1501 - PoE Door Controller - UKCA DoC
ADC-AC-LP1502 - Door Controller - CE DoC
ADC-AC-LP1502 - Door Controller - UKCA DoC
ADC-AC-MR16IN - Input Monitor Expansion Module - CE DoC
ADC-AC-MR16IN - Input Monitor Expansion Module - UKCA DoC
ADC-AC-MR16OUT - Output Control Expansion Module - CE DoC
ADC-AC-MR16OUT - Output Control Expansion Module - UKCA DoC
ADC-AC-MR50 - Single Reader Expansion Module - CE DoC
ADC-AC-MR50 - Single Reader Expansion Module - UKCA DoC
ADC-AC-MR52 - Two Reader Expansion Module - CE DoC
ADC-AC-MR52 - Two Reader Expansion Module - UKCA DoC
ADC-AC-X100 - Two Reader Expansion Module - CE DoC
ADC-AC-X100 - Two Reader Expansion Module - UKCA DoC
ADC-AC-X200 - Input Monitor Expansion Module - CE DoC
ADC-AC-X200 - Input Monitor Expansion Module - UKCA DoC
ADC-AC-X300 - Output Control Expansion Module - CE DoC
ADC-AC-X300 - Output Control Expansion Module - UKCA DoC
ADC-AC-X1100 - Door Controller - CE DoC
ADC-AC-X1100 - Door Controller - UKCA DoC
ADC-BB-FLEX-A / ADC-FLEX-100 - FLEX IO - CE DoC
ADC-CSVR21XXP - Alarm.com Commercial Steam Video Recorder - CE DoC
ADC-R100 - Alarm.com System Enhancement Module - CE DoC
ADC-S2000 - Alarm.com Temperature Sensor with Probe - CE DoC
ADC-SVR210 - Alarm.com Stream Video Recorder - CE DoC
ADC-T2000 - Alarm.com Smart Thermostat - CE DoC
ADC-V515 - Alarm.com Indoor Wi-Fi Camera - CE DoC
ADC-V523 - Alarm.com 1080p Indoor Wi-Fi Video Camera - CE DoC
ADC-V523x - Alarm.com Wi-Fi Indoor Camera - CE DoC
ADC-V622 - Alarm.com 180⁰ HD Camera with Enhanced Zoom and Two-Way Audio - CE DoC
ADC-V723 - Alarm.com 1080p Outdoor Wi-Fi Video Camera with HDR - CE DoC
ADC-V723X - Alarm.com 1080p Outdoor Wi-Fi Video Camera with HDR - CE DoC
ADC-V724 - Alarm.com 1080p Outdoor Wi-Fi Video Camera with HDR and Two-Way Audio - CE DoC
ADC-V724x - Alarm.com 1080p Outdoor Wi-Fi Video Camera with HDR and Two-Way Audio - CE DoC
ADC-V729(DC) - 4MP Outdoor Camera Floodlight - CE DoC
ADC-VC827P - Alarm.com 1080p Indoor/Outdoor Dome Camera - CE DoC
ADC-VDB105X / ADC-VDB106X - Slim Line II Doorbell Camera - CE DoC
ADC-VDB750 - Alarm.com Video Doorbell - CE DoC
ADC-VDB755P - Alarm.com PoE Video Doorbell - CE DoC
ADC-VDB770 - Alarm.com Video Doorbell - CE DoC
ADC-VDB780B - Alarm.com Wireless Video Doorbell - CE DoC
ADC-W115C-INT - Alarm.com Smart Chime - CE DoC
UK PSTI Act 2022 - UK DoC
Security Feedback
Patents
X
Alarm.com uses cookies for security and to improve your experience on our site. Cookies enable you to enjoy a custom browsing experience and allow us to analyze our site traffic. Click “Accept All Cookies” to consent to the use of cookies or click “Cookie Settings” to find out more about how cookies are used or to change your cookie preferences.
Cookie settings
Cookie settings
This website uses essential cookies for the operation and security of the website and uses other cookies to improve functionality and the user experience.  You may select your choice of cookies to allow on our website below.
Disabled Toggle
Essential Cookies (required)
These cookies are strictly necessary to provide you with the services available through our website, including the use of certain features like secure access to password-protected accounts.  This category of cookies cannot be disabled.
Toggle
Non-Essential Cookies
Analytics Cookies
These cookies are used to enhance the performance and functionality of the website, but they are non-essential to your use of the website.  However, without these cookies certain functionality may be unavailable to you.  These cookies may collect information that help us understand usage of our website to measure and improve performance of our website.
Advertising/Tracking Cookies
These cookies are used to make advertising messages more relevant to you.  These cookies may also collect information about which pages you visit on our website and if you are accessing the website from clicking on advertising on another site or social network.  These cookies allow us to evaluate the effectiveness of our marketing campaigns and our website.
Sub-policy 3
https://globalprivacycontrol.org/#download:
GPC signal not detected.
Please
download a browser/extension
that supports it.
Take control of your privacy.
Online privacy should be accessible to everyone. It starts with a simpler way to exercise your rights.
Get Started
Get Involved
Read the Latest Press Release
and
Follow @globalprivctrl on Twitter
.
Turn On
GPC
Enable Global Privacy Control to communicate your privacy preference.
Send the Signal
Your browser will send the
GPC
signal to websites you visit.
Exercise Your Rights
Participating websites can respect your privacy rights accordingly.
You may have noticed “Do Not Sell” and “Object To Processing” links around the web from companies complying with privacy regulations. To opt out of websites selling or sharing your personal information, you need to click these links for every site you visit.
Now you can exercise your legal privacy rights in one step via Global Privacy Control (
GPC
), required under the California Consumer Protection Act (CCPA).
Together, over a dozen organizations are developing the
GPC
specification.
Get Involved
GPC
lets users signal their desired privacy, just by browsing.
GPC
is available as part of several major browsers, extensions, and websites.
View Full Spec
Test against the reference server
The
GPC
signal will be intended to communicate a Do Not Sell request from a global privacy control, as per
CCPA-REGULATIONS §999.315
for that browser or device, or, if known, the consumer. Under the GDPR, the intent of the
GPC
signal is to convey a general request that data controllers limit the sale or sharing of the user’s personal data to other data controllers (
GDPR Articles 7 & 21
). Over time, the
GPC
signal may be intended to communicate rights in other jurisdictions.
“
CA DOJ is encouraged to see the technology community developing a global privacy control in furtherance of the CCPA and consumer privacy rights.
”
Xavier Becerra
CA Attorney General
“
40 million consumers are now using web browsers and other privacy tools that support this global opt out. Major publishers, the New York Times, Washington Post, have already pledged to respect it. California's Attorney General has already said that companies must respect GPC. This is a big step in Americans privacy, a big, big step forward.
”
Ron Wyden
Senate Finance Chairman
“
My hope is that Governor Northam and the legislature will improve [the newly passed Virginia Consumer Data Protection Act] in the near future in important ways... making it easier for Virginia citizens to invoke their privacy rights, such as through a global privacy control.
”
Mark R. Warner
VA Senator
“
GPC provides a clear and binary indication of an individual's choice... Based on a review of several of the web browsers' intentions regarding GPC, it appears likely to be a prominent, easily understandable, and accessible mechanism in the browser settings.
”
Alexander McD White
Bermuda Privacy Commissioner
“
It's past time to give consumers a real and enforceable way to stop companies from tracking and selling their data. My Mind Your Own Business Act would do just that, and this project [Global Privacy Control] shows it’s possible.
”
Ron Wyden
Senate Finance Chairman
“
CCPA requires businesses to treat a user-enabled global privacy control as a legally valid consumer request to opt out of the sale of their data. CCPA opened the door to developing a technical standard, like the GPC, which satisfies this legal requirement & protects privacy.
”
Xavier Becerra
CA Attorney General
Got to slide
0
Got to slide
1
Got to slide
2
Got to slide
3
Got to slide
4
Got to slide
5
Join over 50 million users.
Download a supported browser or extension and start exercising your privacy rights with GPC.
View All Downloads
Abine DeleteMe
LEARN MORE
about
Abine DeleteMe
Brave Browser
LEARN MORE
about
Brave Browser
Disconnect
LEARN MORE
about
Disconnect
DuckDuckGo Privacy Browser
LEARN MORE
about
DuckDuckGo Privacy Browser
Firefox
LEARN MORE
about
Firefox
OptMeowt by privacy-tech-lab
LEARN MORE
about
OptMeowt by privacy-tech-lab
Privacy Badger by EFF
LEARN MORE
about
Privacy Badger by EFF
lockrMail by lockr
LEARN MORE
about
lockrMail by lockr
Founding Organizations
The following organizations, representing 50 million users and hundreds of thousands of websites, are in support of GPC.
View All Organizations
Featured Press & Announcements
GPC Privacy Browser Signal Now Used by Millions and Honored By Major Publishers
Global Privacy Control
Your browser can tell websites how to treat your data. But companies didn’t have to listen — until now
The Washington Post
‘Do Not Track’ Is Back, and This Time It Might Work
Wired
Tech-publisher coalition backs new push for browser-level privacy controls
TechCrunch
View More Press
Frequently Asked Questions
Global Privacy Control (GPC) is a proposed specification designed to allow
Internet users to notify businesses of their privacy preferences, such as
whether or not they want their personal information to be sold or shared. It
consists of a setting or extension in the user’s browser or mobile device and
acts as a mechanism that websites can use to indicate they support the
specification.
GPC is being developed by a broad coalition of stakeholders:
technologists, web publishers, technology companies,
browser vendors, extension developers, academics, and
civil rights organizations.
The GPC was initially spearheaded by
Ashkan
Soltani
Georgetown
Law
and
Sebastian
Zimmeck
(
Wesleyan
University
) in collaboration with
The New York
Times
,
The Washington
Post
,
Financial Times
,
Automattic (Wordpress.com & Tumblr)
,
Glitch
,
DuckDuckGo
,
Brave
,
Mozilla
,
Disconnect
,
Abine
,
Digital Content Next (DCN)
,
Consumer
Reports
, and the
Electronic Frontier Foundation (EFF)
.
GPC is available for an increasing number of browsers and browser extensions,
listed
here
. If you want to use
GPC, you can download and enable it via a participating browser or browser
extension. More information about downloading GPC is available
here
.
The GPC spec is easy to implement on a wide variety of websites and other
services. The proposed specification and back-end implementation reference
documentation are available
here
.
For additional information, please feel free to reach out on Github or Twitter
(
@globablprivctrl
).
As it is intended to invoke users’ privacy rights, we encourage policymakers
from around the world to engage in the development of this specification. If you
would like to learn more about how GPC could work in your jurisdiction, please
contact us via email at
info[at]globalprivacycontrol.org
.
GPC was initially introduced at the World Wide Web Consortium (W3C)
Privacy
Community Group
(Privacy CG) in April 2020. A
number of stakeholders are part of that community. There are ongoing
discussions in the Privacy CG. Interested parties are encouraged to engage with
the proposal
here
.
Additionally, GPC is currently being implemented across the web. A number of
browsers, extensions, and publishers are supporting or implementing GPC (see
below).
View All
FAQ
s
Get Involved
Contact us to learn more about supporting
GPC
in your browser, app, or website.
@globalprivctrl
Sub-policy 4
https://smarthome.new/legal/eea-policy:
Skip to main content
Alarm.com - Smart Home & Business Security Systems
Get Started
Log In
Menu
For Home
Close
Total Protection
Security & Safety
Video Monitoring
Home Management
For Business
Close
Business Type
Small & Medium Business (SMB)
Commercial
Multi-location Management
Services
Intrusion Detection
Video Surveillance & Cameras
Access Control
Energy Management & Temperature Monitoring
Testimonials
Business Testimonials
Industry Solutions
Retail
Food and Beverage
K-12
Business Offices
Light Industrial
Testimonials
Business Testimonials
Specialized Solutions
Homebuilders
Senior Living & Care Providers
Resources
Close
Resources Hub
For Home
For Business
How To
FAQ
Compatible Hardware
Press Center
Contact Us
For Partners
Close
Partner Resources
Become a Partner
Login
AFRICA
Nigeria
South Africa
ASIA & PACIFIC
Australia
Japan
Malaysia
New Zealand
Singapore
Thailand
EUROPE
Belgium
Cyprus
Denmark
Finland
France
Iceland
Italy
Netherlands
Norway
Portugal
Spain
Sweden
Turkey
United Kingdom
NORTH & SOUTH AMERICA
Argentina
Bahamas
Barbados
Bermuda
Bolivia
Brazil
Canada
Cayman Islands
Chile
Columbia
Costa Rica
Dominican Republic
El Salvador
Guatemala
Jamaica
Mexico
Panama
Peru
Saint Kitts & Nevis
Trinidad & Tobago
Turks & Caicos
Uruguay
United States
US Virgin Islands
MIDDLE EAST
Israel
Log In
Search
Toggle
Privacy Notice to Data Subjects in the EEA, the UK and Switzerland
Date of issue:  September 1, 2021
Scope
If you are a resident of the EEA (specifically, any country in the European Union, Liechtenstein, Norway, Iceland) or a resident of the United Kingdom ("UK") or a resident of Switzerland, this Privacy Notice to Data Subjects in the EEA, the UK and Switzerland ("Privacy Notice") explains what personal data we collect about you, how it is used, with whom it is shared, and rights you may exercise in relation to your personal data.
This Privacy Notice applies to our privacy practices for your use of (i) this website and any mobile sites or applications operated by Alarm.com, including the Alarm.com application, (the "User Interfaces") and (ii) any combination of Alarm.com's products and services purchased or accessed via any User Interface (the "Services"), and all personal data we directly receive or collect from you in the course of doing business.  Alarm.com's business address is 8281 Greensboro Drive, Suite 100, Tysons, VA 22102 USA.
Alarm.com's Services are provided by licensed and authorized service providers ("Authorized Service Providers"). If you are a customer of an Authorized Service Provider, your information will be processed by Alarm.com acting as a data processor and your Authorized Service Provider will remain responsible for the handling of any personal information it collects from you and for compliance with any applicable data protection and/or privacy laws.  You should refer to the Authorized Service Providers' privacy notice for more information on the Authorized Service Providers' privacy practices.
Data Collection and Use
Data You Provide to Us
If you are an owner, agent, or employee of an existing or prospective Authorized Service Provider, you may provide us with personal data when you register with Alarm.com, engage with customer support or marketing, and transact business with Alarm.com.
If you are an existing or prospective customer of an Authorized Service Provider, you may provide us with personal data when you set up your account with Alarm.com and use Alarm.com User Interfaces or Services.
We may use this information for our business operations, to communicate with you or your Authorized Service Provider (as applicable), to comply with the law, and to protect the security and integrity of the User Interfaces and Services.
Data We Collect and Process on Behalf of Authorized Service Providers
When using the User Interfaces, you may provide us with personal data including, but not limited to, your name, home or business address, phone number, email address, location, or zip code.
When using our Services, you or your Authorized Service Provider may provide us with certain additional information (e.g., unit description, home or business size, home or business system configuration, sensor names, appliances or other devices monitored by Alarm.com, account information, schedule, mode, automation settings, and device settings) in order to help us personalize your Services.  Alarm.com may also receive personal data that you have provided to our partners, including emergency contact information and user profile information, to enable Alarm.com to provide our Services.
On behalf of you or your Authorized Service Provider, Alarm.com may process information regarding your use of the Alarm.com Services, including but not limited to: performance of any security or other device monitored by Alarm.com, electrical usage or consumption, heating and cooling information, light or other fixture settings, and usage and alert logs. We receive this type of information from your devices that are monitored by Alarm.com and your computer or other electronic device through which you may access, browse, download, receive, or otherwise use the Alarm.com User Interfaces or Services (each a "Personal Device"), and we may also receive and collect such information from third parties.
Alarm.com will process all personal data received by Authorized Service Providers via contractual arrangements and may use compiled aggregate statistics about the User Interfaces and Services to improve our Services.
Location-based Information
Some features of our Services, such as location-activated arming reminders, thermostat adjustments, vehicle diagnostics, and other location-based Services (collectively, "GeoServices"), use location information. Before certain GeoServices information can be used, you must first opt-in to activate these Services. If you enable these features, we will automatically collect and store location information from your Personal Device or vehicle you designate which is capable of producing location data (e.g., mobile device, GPS device, or vehicle). This location information may include your current location or places you have recently visited. We also may aggregate this information, but this information will only be used for Alarm.com's internal purposes and to provide information requested by you. If you do not wish for us to collect and store this information, do not enable these features.
Video and Audio Data
When you (i) subscribe to Alarm.com's video monitoring or video monitoring add-on Services (such as the Visual Verification services), (ii) use a connected doorbell, camera, image sensor, or other connected device or wearable that is capable of recording video and/or audio recordings, or (iii) subscribe to two-way voice, you may enable us, certain of our third-party service providers, or your Central Station (as defined below), to record, store, view and process video and/or audio recordings from your monitoring equipment. This may include capturing and sending to you portions of this data as part of a notification or analyzing the data to identify motion or other events. We may process information from your monitoring equipment so that we can send you alerts. In addition, if you have the recording features enabled, we will capture, process and store video and audio data recordings from your device and you may be able to access those recordings. As used herein, a "Central Station" is a third party selected by your Authorized Service Provider to receive alarm signals and coordinate emergency response.
Data protection and privacy laws in your country may impose certain responsibilities on you and your use of security cameras, connected doorbells and other devices with recording capabilities. You (not Alarm.com) are responsible for ensuring that you comply with any applicable laws. For example, you may need to display a notice that alerts visitors to your home or business that they may be recorded using security cameras and other devices with recording capabilities. Alarm.com takes no responsibility for your compliance with these laws.
Data We Collect Automatically
When you use the User Interfaces or access Alarm.com Services using your Personal Device, certain information may be collected by automated means, such as cookies. Information about Alarm.com’s use of cookies can be found in our
Cookie Policy
.
Legal Basis for Processing Personal Data
We will only collect and process personal data about you where we have a legal basis. Legal bases include consent (where you have given consent), contract (where processing is necessary for entering into or the performance of a contract with you), compliance with a legal obligation, and "legitimate interests."
Where we process personal data based on consent, we will ask for your unambiguous consent. You may withdraw your consent at any time, but that will not affect the lawfulness of the processing of your personal data prior to such withdrawal.
We may process your personal data for the purposes of our legitimate interests, provided that such processing does not outweigh your rights and freedoms.  Where we rely on legitimate interests, you have the right to object.  Please keep in mind that if you object this may affect our ability to perform certain services for your benefit.  We process your personal data based on legitimate interests in order to:
Protect you, us, or others from security threats by enhancing the security of our network and information systems;
Identify and prevent fraud;
Comply with applicable laws and industry regulations;
Enable or administer our business, such as for invoicing Authorized Service Providers and maintenance of User Interfaces; and
Improve our User Interfaces and Services by enabling us to enhance, modify, or personalize them for your benefit.
Data Sharing
Alarm.com will not disclose your personal data to any other entity except:
as is necessary to provide the Alarm.com User Interfaces and Services to you;
to your Authorized Service Provider (also referred to as your Alarm.com Dealer), the company through which you subscribed to our Services;
to the Central Station selected by your Authorized Service Provider to receive alarm signals and coordinate emergency response;
when you have opted in to share the information;
to third party suppliers, subcontractors or business partners who work or perform services on our behalf and are only permitted to use the minimum amount of information necessary to assist in providing the Services;
as necessary in connection with other lawful business purposes; and
as otherwise necessary when required or permitted by law.
In addition, we may disclose your personal data when the personal data has been converted to a form that cannot be used to identify you. It may also be necessary for us to disclose your personal data in case of a merger or combination with, or acquisition of a portion of our business by, another company or entity, in which case personal data collected by Alarm.com would be expected to be one of the transferred business assets.
International Data Transfers
Our servers and offices are located in the United States, so your personal data will be transferred to, stored, or processed in the United States.  We rely on legally-provided mechanisms to lawfully transfer personal data across borders, including the European Commission-approved "Standard Contractual Clauses" or "Model Clauses."
Exercising Your Rights
Right to Access, Correct, Update and Delete Personal Data
You may view, update, or delete certain personal data at any time by following the links at www.alarm.com to your profile and address book pages. These changes will be immediately made to our records. If you wish to stop Services notifications, you may do so through the User Interfaces.  For customers of Authorized Service Providers, changes you make to your user profile on the Alarm.com User Interfaces to your user profile may not automatically change the records of your Authorized Service Provider. You should contact your Authorized Service Provider directly to make changes to its records.
By contacting your Authorized Service Providers, you can also exercise the following rights:
Deletion.
You can ask to erase or delete all or some of your personal data (e.g., if it is no longer necessary to provide Services to you).
Object to, or Limit or Restrict, Use of Data.
You can ask to stop using all or some of your personal data (e.g., if there is no legal right to keep using it) or to limit use of it (e.g., if your personal data is inaccurate or unlawfully held).
Take Your Data.
You can ask for a copy of your personal data provided in a machine readable form.
If we have collected and processed your personal data with your consent, then you can withdraw your consent at any time.  Withdrawing your consent will not affect the lawfulness of any processing we conducted prior to your withdrawal, nor will it affect processing of your personal data conducted in reliance on lawful processing grounds other than consent.
We do not make use of automated decision-making.  As defined under current data protection laws, automated decisions are defined as decisions about individuals that are based solely on the automated (i.e., no human involvement) processing of data and that produce legal effects or that significantly affect the individuals involved.
You have the right to register a complaint with a European data protection or supervisory authority about our collection and use of your personal information.  For more information, please contact your local data protection authority.  For more information, please contact your local data protection authority  (contact details for data protection authorities in the EEA are available at
https://edpb.europa.eu/about-edpb/board/members_en
; contact details for the data protection authority in the UK are available at
https://ico.org.uk/
; and contact details for the Swiss data protection authority are available here
https://ico.org.uk/
).
(contact details for data protection authorities in the EEA, the UK and Switzerland are available at
https://edpb.europa.eu/about-edpb/board/members_en
).
We respond to all requests we receive from individuals wishing to exercise their data protection rights in accordance with applicable data protection laws.  We may ask you to verify your identity in order to help us respond efficiently to your request.
Retention Period
We retain the personal data that we collect from you where we have an ongoing legitimate business need to do so (for example, to provide you with the Services you requested or to comply with an applicable legal requirement).
Information Protection
Alarm.com has security measures in place to protect against the loss, misuse, and alteration of your personal data. For example, we protect your information through a unique username and password, and we protect certain sensitive communications with our website through server authentication and secure connections.
Third Party Websites
For your convenience, some hyperlinks may be posted on the Alarm.com website that link to other websites not under Alarm.com's control. Alarm.com is not responsible for, and this Privacy Policy does not apply to, the privacy practices of those sites or of any companies that Alarm.com does not own or control. Alarm.com does not endorse any of these websites or pages, the services or products described or offered on such sites or pages, or any of the content contained on those sites or pages. Alarm.com encourages you to seek out and read the privacy policy of each website that you visit. In addition, should you happen to initiate a transaction on a website linked to the Alarm.com website, even if you reached that site through the Alarm.com User Interfaces, the information that you submit to complete that transaction becomes subject to the privacy practices of the operator of that linked website. You should read that website's privacy policies to understand how personal data that is collected about you is used and protected.
Changes to Our Privacy Notice
We may modify our Privacy Notice from time to time, and we will post the revised statement here, with an updated revision date. If we revise our Privacy Notice in a material way, we will provide a conspicuous notice on our website before any changes take effect.
Contact Information
You can contact our data protection officer (DPO) at privacy@alarm.com.
Terms & Conditions
Terms & Conditions
Terms & Conditions (Canada)
Terms & Conditions (Canada - French)
Terms & Conditions (Brazil - Portuguese)
Terms & Conditions (Portugal - Portuguese)
Privacy Policy
Alarm.com's Privacy Policy (United States - English)
Alarm.com's California Residents Privacy Rights Notice
Privacy Notice to Data Subjects in the EEA and Switzerland
Alarm.com's Privacy Policy (Argentina - Spanish)
Alarm.com's Privacy Policy (Australia - English)
Alarm.com's Privacy Policy (Belgium - Dutch)
Alarm.com's Privacy Policy (Belgium - French)
Alarm.com's Privacy Policy (Brazil - Portuguese)
Alarm.com's Privacy Policy (Canada - English)
Alarm.com's Privacy Policy (Canada - French)
Alarm.com's Privacy Policy (Chile - Spanish)
Alarm.com's Privacy Policy (Colombia - Spanish)
Alarm.com's Privacy Policy (Costa Rica - Spanish)
Alarm.com's Privacy Policy (Denmark - Danish)
Alarm.com's Privacy Policy (Dominican Republic - Spanish)
Alarm.com's Privacy Policy (Ecuador - Spanish)
Alarm.com's Privacy Policy (El Salvador - Spanish)
Alarm.com's Privacy Policy (Finland - Finnish)
Alarm.com's Privacy Policy (France - French)
Alarm.com's Privacy Policy (Guatemala - Spanish)
Alarm.com's Privacy Policy (Iceland - Icelandic)
Alarm.com's Privacy Policy (Israel - Hebrew)
Alarm.com's Privacy Policy (Italy - Italian)
Alarm.com's Privacy Policy (Japan - Japanese)
Alarm.com's Privacy Policy (Malaysia - English)
Alarm.com's Privacy Policy (Malaysia - Malay)
Alarm.com's Privacy Policy (Mexico - Spanish)
Alarm.com's Privacy Policy (Netherlands - Dutch)
Alarm.com's Privacy Policy (New Zealand - English)
Alarm.com's Privacy Policy (Norway - Norwegian)
Alarm.com's Privacy Policy (Panama - Spanish)
Alarm.com's Privacy Policy (Paraguay - Spanish)
Alarm.com's Privacy Policy (Peru - Spanish)
Alarm.com's Privacy Policy (Poland - Polish)
Alarm.com's Privacy Policy (Portugal - Portuguese)
Alarm.com's Privacy Policy (Spain - Spanish)
Alarm.com's Privacy Policy (Sweden - Swedish)
Alarm.com's Privacy Policy (Thailand - Thai)
Alarm.com's Privacy Policy (Uruguay - Spanish)
Alarm.com Data Privacy Framework Notice
Cookie Policy
Alarm.com's Cookie Policy
Alarm.com's Cookie Policy (Canada - English)
Alarm.com's Cookie Policy (Canada - French)
Unsolicited Telemarketing Calls
NDAA
EU Radio Equipment Directive
ADC-AC-ET10, ADC-AC-ET20, ADC-AC-ET25 - Ethos Readers - CE DoC
ADC-AC-ET10, ADC-AC-ET20, ADC-AC-ET25 - Ethos Readers - UKCA DoC
ADC-AC-LP1501 - PoE Door Controller - CE DoC
ADC-AC-LP1501 - PoE Door Controller - UKCA DoC
ADC-AC-LP1502 - Door Controller - CE DoC
ADC-AC-LP1502 - Door Controller - UKCA DoC
ADC-AC-MR16IN - Input Monitor Expansion Module - CE DoC
ADC-AC-MR16IN - Input Monitor Expansion Module - UKCA DoC
ADC-AC-MR16OUT - Output Control Expansion Module - CE DoC
ADC-AC-MR16OUT - Output Control Expansion Module - UKCA DoC
ADC-AC-MR50 - Single Reader Expansion Module - CE DoC
ADC-AC-MR50 - Single Reader Expansion Module - UKCA DoC
ADC-AC-MR52 - Two Reader Expansion Module - CE DoC
ADC-AC-MR52 - Two Reader Expansion Module - UKCA DoC
ADC-AC-X100 - Two Reader Expansion Module - CE DoC
ADC-AC-X100 - Two Reader Expansion Module - UKCA DoC
ADC-AC-X200 - Input Monitor Expansion Module - CE DoC
ADC-AC-X200 - Input Monitor Expansion Module - UKCA DoC
ADC-AC-X300 - Output Control Expansion Module - CE DoC
ADC-AC-X300 - Output Control Expansion Module - UKCA DoC
ADC-AC-X1100 - Door Controller - CE DoC
ADC-AC-X1100 - Door Controller - UKCA DoC
ADC-BB-FLEX-A / ADC-FLEX-100 - FLEX IO - CE DoC
ADC-CSVR21XXP - Alarm.com Commercial Steam Video Recorder - CE DoC
ADC-R100 - Alarm.com System Enhancement Module - CE DoC
ADC-S2000 - Alarm.com Temperature Sensor with Probe - CE DoC
ADC-SVR210 - Alarm.com Stream Video Recorder - CE DoC
ADC-T2000 - Alarm.com Smart Thermostat - CE DoC
ADC-V515 - Alarm.com Indoor Wi-Fi Camera - CE DoC
ADC-V523 - Alarm.com 1080p Indoor Wi-Fi Video Camera - CE DoC
ADC-V523x - Alarm.com Wi-Fi Indoor Camera - CE DoC
ADC-V622 - Alarm.com 180⁰ HD Camera with Enhanced Zoom and Two-Way Audio - CE DoC
ADC-V723 - Alarm.com 1080p Outdoor Wi-Fi Video Camera with HDR - CE DoC
ADC-V723X - Alarm.com 1080p Outdoor Wi-Fi Video Camera with HDR - CE DoC
ADC-V724 - Alarm.com 1080p Outdoor Wi-Fi Video Camera with HDR and Two-Way Audio - CE DoC
ADC-V724x - Alarm.com 1080p Outdoor Wi-Fi Video Camera with HDR and Two-Way Audio - CE DoC
ADC-V729(DC) - 4MP Outdoor Camera Floodlight - CE DoC
ADC-VC827P - Alarm.com 1080p Indoor/Outdoor Dome Camera - CE DoC
ADC-VDB105X / ADC-VDB106X - Slim Line II Doorbell Camera - CE DoC
ADC-VDB750 - Alarm.com Video Doorbell - CE DoC
ADC-VDB755P - Alarm.com PoE Video Doorbell - CE DoC
ADC-VDB770 - Alarm.com Video Doorbell - CE DoC
ADC-VDB780B - Alarm.com Wireless Video Doorbell - CE DoC
ADC-W115C-INT - Alarm.com Smart Chime - CE DoC
UK PSTI Act 2022 - UK DoC
Security Feedback
Patents
X
Alarm.com uses cookies for security and to improve your experience on our site. Cookies enable you to enjoy a custom browsing experience and allows us to analyze our site traffic. Click 'Cookie Settings' to find out more about how cookies are used, change your preferences or to consent to the use of cookies by turning them ON.
Cookie settings
Cookie settings
This website uses essential cookies for the operation and security of the website and uses other cookies to improve functionality and the user experience.  You may select your choice of cookies to allow on our website below.
Disabled Toggle
Essential Cookies (required)
These cookies are strictly necessary to provide you with the services available through our website, including the use of certain features like secure access to password-protected accounts.  This category of cookies cannot be disabled.
Toggle
Non-Essential Cookies
Analytics Cookies
These cookies are used to enhance the performance and functionality of the website, but they are non-essential to your use of the website.  However, without these cookies certain functionality may be unavailable to you.  These cookies may collect information that help us understand usage of our website to measure and improve performance of our website.
Advertising/Tracking Cookies
These cookies are used to make advertising messages more relevant to you.  These cookies may also collect information about which pages you visit on our website and if you are accessing the website from clicking on advertising on another site or social network.  These cookies allow us to evaluate the effectiveness of our marketing campaigns and our website.
Sub-policy 5
http://smarthome.new/legal/privacy-shield-policy:
Skip to main content
Alarm.com - Smart Home & Business Security Systems
Get Started
Log In
Menu
For Home
Close
Total Protection
Security & Safety
Video Monitoring
Home Management
For Business
Close
Business Type
Small & Medium Business (SMB)
Commercial
Multi-location Management
Services
Intrusion Detection
Video Surveillance & Cameras
Access Control
Energy Management & Temperature Monitoring
Testimonials
Business Testimonials
Industry Solutions
Retail
Food and Beverage
K-12
Business Offices
Light Industrial
Testimonials
Business Testimonials
Specialized Solutions
Homebuilders
Senior Living & Care Providers
Resources
Close
Resources Hub
For Home
For Business
How To
FAQ
Compatible Hardware
Press Center
Contact Us
For Partners
Close
Partner Resources
Become a Partner
Login
AFRICA
Nigeria
South Africa
ASIA & PACIFIC
Australia
Japan
Malaysia
New Zealand
Singapore
Thailand
EUROPE
Belgium
Cyprus
Denmark
Finland
France
Iceland
Italy
Netherlands
Norway
Portugal
Spain
Sweden
Turkey
United Kingdom
NORTH & SOUTH AMERICA
Argentina
Bahamas
Barbados
Bermuda
Bolivia
Brazil
Canada
Cayman Islands
Chile
Columbia
Costa Rica
Dominican Republic
El Salvador
Guatemala
Jamaica
Mexico
Panama
Peru
Saint Kitts & Nevis
Trinidad & Tobago
Turks & Caicos
Uruguay
United States
US Virgin Islands
MIDDLE EAST
Israel
Log In
Search
Toggle
Alarm.com's Data Privacy Framework Notice
Alarm.com Incorporated (Alarm.com) complies with the EU-U.S. Data Privacy  Framework (EU-U.S. DPF), the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF, and the Swiss-U.S. Data Privacy Framework (Swiss-U.S. DPF)  as set forth by the U.S. Department of Commerce. Alarm.com has certified to the U.S. Department of Commerce that it adheres to the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework Principles (EU-U.S. DPF Principles) with regard to the collection, use, retention, transfer, and other processing of Personal Data (as defined below) received from the European Economic Area (EEA) in reliance on the EU-U.S. DPF and from the United Kingdom (and Gibraltar) in reliance on the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF. Alarm.com has certified to the U.S. Department of Commerce that it adheres to the Swiss-U.S. Data Privacy Framework Principles (Swiss-U.S. DPF Principles) with regard to the processing of Personal Data received from Switzerland in reliance on the Swiss-U.S. DPF.  If there is any conflict between the terms in this Data Privacy Framework Notice (Notice) and the EU-U.S. DPF Principles and/or the Swiss-U.S. DPF Principles, the Principles shall govern.
To learn more about the Data Privacy Framework (DPF) program, please visit https://www.dataprivacyframework.gov/. To view our certification visit the DPF list at https://www.dataprivacyframework.gov/s/participant-search.
For more information about Alarm.com's privacy practices generally, please review Alarm.com's Privacy Policy.
Websites and mobile sites to which this Notice applies are United States-based websites, which are subject to United States law.
For purposes of this Notice, "Personal Data" means information that (i) is transferred from the EEA, the UK, or Switzerland to the United States, (ii) is recorded in any form, (iii) is about, or relates to, an identified or identifiable consumer, customer, service provider or other individual, and (iv) can be linked to that consumer, customer, service provider or other individual. This Notice outlines our general policy and practices for implementing the EU-U.S. DPF Principles and Swiss-U.S. DPF Principles for Personal Data.
Additionally, "consumer" as used in this Notice means any natural or legal person (to the extent a legal person is subject to a national data protection law in the EEA, the UK, or Switzerland), but excludes any individual acting in his or her capacity as a former, current or prospective Alarm.com employee, agent, consultant or contractor.
Data Privacy Framework Principles
Alarm.com’s practices regarding the collection, storage, transfer, use and other processing of Personal Data comply with the EU-U.S. DPF Principles and Swiss-U.S. DPF Principles of notice, choice, accountability for onward transfer, access, security, data integrity and purpose limitation, and recourse enforcement and liability.
Notice
We notify our customers and service providers located in the EEA, the UK, and Switzerland about the purposes for which we collect and use Personal Data, the types of third parties to which we disclose the information, the choices customers and service providers have for limiting the use and disclosure of their information, and how to contact us about our practices concerning Personal Data.
When we receive Personal Data from our affiliates and service providers in the EEA, the UK, or Switzerland, we will use and disclose such information in accordance with the notices provided by such entities and the choices made by the individuals to whom such Personal Data relates.
Purpose of Collection and Use of Personal Data
Alarm.com collects certain Personal Data such as:
names
addresses
phone numbers
email addresses
system data (e.g., alarm monitoring, thermostat, light and lock remote control).
We do not collect sensitive Personal Data of customers or service providers, such as information about medical or health conditions, racial or ethnic origin, political opinions, religious or philosophical beliefs, trade union membership or other sensitive information as defined by the EU-U.S. DPF, UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF and Swiss-U.S. DPF.
We use Personal Data of customers and service providers to:
provide you services and to respond to your requests
evaluate the quality of our products and services
communicate with you about our products, services and related issues
notify you of and administer offers and other promotions
for internal administrative and analytics purposes and to comply with our legal obligations, policies and procedures.
Choice
Alarm.com may share Personal Data with its service providers that deliver the Alarm.com services to you, business partners (like other technology providers with whom we integrate our services) among Alarm.com’s subsidiaries and affiliates. With respect to Personal Data we may share with other third parties, we provide customers and service providers located in the EEA, the UK, and Switzerland with an opportunity to opt-out of such sharing. Please email us at support@alarm.com if you would like to opt-out. We do not use Personal Data for purposes incompatible with the purposes for which the information was originally collected without notifying the relevant consumers, customers, suppliers and others of such uses and offering an opportunity to opt-out. Should you opt-out as described above, Alarm.com may not be able to provide you with the services you have requested or access certain features of your system.
In addition, we may disclose Personal Data without offering individuals an opportunity to opt-out (i) if we are required to do so by law or legal process, (ii) to law enforcement authorities or other government officials based on an enforceable government request or as may be required under applicable law, or (iii) when we believe disclosure is necessary or appropriate to prevent physical harm or financial loss or in connection with an investigation of suspected or actual illegal activity.
Alarm.com also reserves the right to transfer Personal Data in the event that we sell or transfer all or a portion of our business or assets (including in the event of a reorganization, dissolution or liquidation). Should such a sale or transfer occur, Alarm.com will use reasonable efforts to direct the transferee to use Personal Data in a manner that is consistent with this Notice. Following such a sale or transfer, consumers may contact the entity to which Alarm.com transferred their Personal Data with any inquiries concerning the processing of that information.
Accountability for Onward Transfer of Personal Data
We may share Personal Data with service providers we have retained to perform services on our behalf. We require service providers to whom we disclose Personal Data and who are not subject to laws based on the European Union’s General Data Protection Regulation (GDPR) or the data protection laws of Canada (i.e., the Personal Information Protection and Electronic Documents Act (PIPEDA) and applicable provincial laws), as applicable, to either (i) subscribe to the EU-U.S. DPF Principles and Swiss-U.S. DPF Principles or (ii) contractually agree to provide at least the same level of protection for Personal Data as is required by the relevant DPF Principles. If the third party does not comply with its privacy obligations, Alarm.com will take commercially reasonable steps to prevent or stop the use or disclosure of Personal Data. If a third party service provider providing services on Alarm.com’s behalf processes Personal Data from the EEA, the UK, or Switzerland in a manner inconsistent with the EU-U.S. DPF Principles and Swiss-U.S. DPF Principles, Alarm.com will be liable unless we can prove that we are not responsible for the event giving rise to the damages.
Access to Personal Data
Alarm.com provides consumers, customers, suppliers and others with confirmation of whether or not Alarm.com is processing personal data relating to them and reasonable access to Personal Data maintained about them. We also provide a reasonable opportunity to correct, amend or delete that information where it is inaccurate. We may limit or deny access to Personal Data where providing such access is unreasonably burdensome or expensive under the circumstances, or as otherwise permitted by the EU-U.S. DPF Principles and Swiss-U.S. DPF Principles. To obtain access to Personal Data, consumers, customers, suppliers and others may contact Alarm.com as specified in the “How to Contact Us” section of this Notice.
Security
Alarm.com maintains reasonable and appropriate administrative, technical and physical safeguards to protect Personal Data from loss, misuse and unauthorized access, disclosure, alteration and destruction.
Data Integrity and Purpose Limitation
Alarm.com takes reasonable steps to ensure that Personal Data collected by Alarm.com is relevant for the purposes for which it is to be used and that the information is reliable for its intended use and is accurate, complete and current. We depend on our consumers, customers, suppliers and others to update or correct their Personal Data whenever necessary.
Recourse, Enforcement and Liability
Alarm.com has established procedures for periodically verifying implementation of and compliance with the EU-U.S. DPF Principles and Swiss-U.S. DPF Principles. We conduct an annual self-assessment of our practices with respect to Personal Data to verify that representations we make about our Personal Data privacy practices are true and that related privacy policies have been implemented as represented.
Consumers, customers, suppliers and others residing in the EEA, the UK, or Switzerland may file a complaint with our IT and Support Department in connection with Alarm.com’s processing of their Personal Data under the EU-U.S. DPF, UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF, and Swiss-U.S. DPF.. Alarm.com commits to refer unresolved privacy or data use complaints concerning our handling of Personal Data received in reliance on the EU-U.S. DPF, UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF, or Swiss-U.S. DPF to TRUSTe, an alternative dispute resolution provider based in the United States. If you do not receive timely acknowledgment of your complaint from us, or if we have not addressed your complaint to your satisfaction, please visit https://feedback-form.truste.com/watchdog/request for more information or to file a complaint.  The services of TRUSTe are provided at no cost to you.
If you have any complaints regarding Alarm.com’s compliance with the EU-U.S. DPF, UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF, or Swiss-U.S. DPF, you should first contact us as provided above. A binding arbitration option will also be made available to individuals in accordance with the DPF Principles in order to address complaints not resolved by any other means. The U.S. Federal Trade Commission has jurisdiction over Alarm.com’s compliance with the EU-U.S. DPF, UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF, and Swiss-U.S. DPF.
How to Contact Us
Please address any questions or concerns regarding this Notice or our practices concerning Personal Data by contacting us through email at:
privacy@alarm.com
or writing to:
Alarm.com Incorporated
8281 Greensboro Drive, Suite 100
Tysons, VA 22102
USA
Amendment
The Alarm.com Data Privacy Framework Notice may be amended from time to time in compliance with the requirements of the EU-U.S. DPF Principles and/or Swiss-U.S. DPF Principles. Appropriate notice will be given concerning such amendments.
This Alarm.com Data Privacy Framework Notice was last updated and posted on October 2, 2023.
Terms & Conditions
Terms & Conditions
Terms & Conditions (Canada)
Terms & Conditions (Canada - French)
Terms & Conditions (Brazil - Portuguese)
Terms & Conditions (Portugal - Portuguese)
Privacy Policy
Alarm.com's Privacy Policy (United States - English)
Alarm.com's California Residents Privacy Rights Notice
Privacy Notice to Data Subjects in the EEA and Switzerland
Alarm.com's Privacy Policy (Argentina - Spanish)
Alarm.com's Privacy Policy (Australia - English)
Alarm.com's Privacy Policy (Belgium - Dutch)
Alarm.com's Privacy Policy (Belgium - French)
Alarm.com's Privacy Policy (Brazil - Portuguese)
Alarm.com's Privacy Policy (Canada - English)
Alarm.com's Privacy Policy (Canada - French)
Alarm.com's Privacy Policy (Chile - Spanish)
Alarm.com's Privacy Policy (Colombia - Spanish)
Alarm.com's Privacy Policy (Costa Rica - Spanish)
Alarm.com's Privacy Policy (Denmark - Danish)
Alarm.com's Privacy Policy (Dominican Republic - Spanish)
Alarm.com's Privacy Policy (Ecuador - Spanish)
Alarm.com's Privacy Policy (El Salvador - Spanish)
Alarm.com's Privacy Policy (Finland - Finnish)
Alarm.com's Privacy Policy (France - French)
Alarm.com's Privacy Policy (Guatemala - Spanish)
Alarm.com's Privacy Policy (Iceland - Icelandic)
Alarm.com's Privacy Policy (Israel - Hebrew)
Alarm.com's Privacy Policy (Italy - Italian)
Alarm.com's Privacy Policy (Japan - Japanese)
Alarm.com's Privacy Policy (Malaysia - English)
Alarm.com's Privacy Policy (Malaysia - Malay)
Alarm.com's Privacy Policy (Mexico - Spanish)
Alarm.com's Privacy Policy (Netherlands - Dutch)
Alarm.com's Privacy Policy (New Zealand - English)
Alarm.com's Privacy Policy (Norway - Norwegian)
Alarm.com's Privacy Policy (Panama - Spanish)
Alarm.com's Privacy Policy (Paraguay - Spanish)
Alarm.com's Privacy Policy (Peru - Spanish)
Alarm.com's Privacy Policy (Poland - Polish)
Alarm.com's Privacy Policy (Portugal - Portuguese)
Alarm.com's Privacy Policy (Spain - Spanish)
Alarm.com's Privacy Policy (Sweden - Swedish)
Alarm.com's Privacy Policy (Thailand - Thai)
Alarm.com's Privacy Policy (Uruguay - Spanish)
Alarm.com Data Privacy Framework Notice
Cookie Policy
Alarm.com's Cookie Policy
Alarm.com's Cookie Policy (Canada - English)
Alarm.com's Cookie Policy (Canada - French)
Unsolicited Telemarketing Calls
NDAA
EU Radio Equipment Directive
ADC-AC-ET10, ADC-AC-ET20, ADC-AC-ET25 - Ethos Readers - CE DoC
ADC-AC-ET10, ADC-AC-ET20, ADC-AC-ET25 - Ethos Readers - UKCA DoC
ADC-AC-LP1501 - PoE Door Controller - CE DoC
ADC-AC-LP1501 - PoE Door Controller - UKCA DoC
ADC-AC-LP1502 - Door Controller - CE DoC
ADC-AC-LP1502 - Door Controller - UKCA DoC
ADC-AC-MR16IN - Input Monitor Expansion Module - CE DoC
ADC-AC-MR16IN - Input Monitor Expansion Module - UKCA DoC
ADC-AC-MR16OUT - Output Control Expansion Module - CE DoC
ADC-AC-MR16OUT - Output Control Expansion Module - UKCA DoC
ADC-AC-MR50 - Single Reader Expansion Module - CE DoC
ADC-AC-MR50 - Single Reader Expansion Module - UKCA DoC
ADC-AC-MR52 - Two Reader Expansion Module - CE DoC
ADC-AC-MR52 - Two Reader Expansion Module - UKCA DoC
ADC-AC-X100 - Two Reader Expansion Module - CE DoC
ADC-AC-X100 - Two Reader Expansion Module - UKCA DoC
ADC-AC-X200 - Input Monitor Expansion Module - CE DoC
ADC-AC-X200 - Input Monitor Expansion Module - UKCA DoC
ADC-AC-X300 - Output Control Expansion Module - CE DoC
ADC-AC-X300 - Output Control Expansion Module - UKCA DoC
ADC-AC-X1100 - Door Controller - CE DoC
ADC-AC-X1100 - Door Controller - UKCA DoC
ADC-BB-FLEX-A / ADC-FLEX-100 - FLEX IO - CE DoC
ADC-CSVR21XXP - Alarm.com Commercial Steam Video Recorder - CE DoC
ADC-R100 - Alarm.com System Enhancement Module - CE DoC
ADC-S2000 - Alarm.com Temperature Sensor with Probe - CE DoC
ADC-SVR210 - Alarm.com Stream Video Recorder - CE DoC
ADC-T2000 - Alarm.com Smart Thermostat - CE DoC
ADC-V515 - Alarm.com Indoor Wi-Fi Camera - CE DoC
ADC-V523 - Alarm.com 1080p Indoor Wi-Fi Video Camera - CE DoC
ADC-V523x - Alarm.com Wi-Fi Indoor Camera - CE DoC
ADC-V622 - Alarm.com 180⁰ HD Camera with Enhanced Zoom and Two-Way Audio - CE DoC
ADC-V723 - Alarm.com 1080p Outdoor Wi-Fi Video Camera with HDR - CE DoC
ADC-V723X - Alarm.com 1080p Outdoor Wi-Fi Video Camera with HDR - CE DoC
ADC-V724 - Alarm.com 1080p Outdoor Wi-Fi Video Camera with HDR and Two-Way Audio - CE DoC
ADC-V724x - Alarm.com 1080p Outdoor Wi-Fi Video Camera with HDR and Two-Way Audio - CE DoC
ADC-V729(DC) - 4MP Outdoor Camera Floodlight - CE DoC
ADC-VC827P - Alarm.com 1080p Indoor/Outdoor Dome Camera - CE DoC
ADC-VDB105X / ADC-VDB106X - Slim Line II Doorbell Camera - CE DoC
ADC-VDB750 - Alarm.com Video Doorbell - CE DoC
ADC-VDB755P - Alarm.com PoE Video Doorbell - CE DoC
ADC-VDB770 - Alarm.com Video Doorbell - CE DoC
ADC-VDB780B - Alarm.com Wireless Video Doorbell - CE DoC
ADC-W115C-INT - Alarm.com Smart Chime - CE DoC
UK PSTI Act 2022 - UK DoC
Security Feedback
Patents
X
Alarm.com uses cookies for security and to improve your experience on our site. Cookies enable you to enjoy a custom browsing experience and allow us to analyze our site traffic. Click “Accept All Cookies” to consent to the use of cookies or click “Cookie Settings” to find out more about how cookies are used or to change your cookie preferences.
Cookie settings
Cookie settings
This website uses essential cookies for the operation and security of the website and uses other cookies to improve functionality and the user experience.  You may select your choice of cookies to allow on our website below.
Disabled Toggle
Essential Cookies (required)
These cookies are strictly necessary to provide you with the services available through our website, including the use of certain features like secure access to password-protected accounts.  This category of cookies cannot be disabled.
Toggle
Non-Essential Cookies
Analytics Cookies
These cookies are used to enhance the performance and functionality of the website, but they are non-essential to your use of the website.  However, without these cookies certain functionality may be unavailable to you.  These cookies may collect information that help us understand usage of our website to measure and improve performance of our website.
Advertising/Tracking Cookies
These cookies are used to make advertising messages more relevant to you.  These cookies may also collect information about which pages you visit on our website and if you are accessing the website from clicking on advertising on another site or social network.  These cookies allow us to evaluate the effectiveness of our marketing campaigns and our website.
Sub-policy 6
https://www.dataprivacyframework.gov/:
You need to enable JavaScript to run this app.
Please wait while application initialize...
;